No one was suggesting that the dead were still alive, or that the dead—by virtue of their having once been alive—did not vanish and cease to exercise an influence over the world; or that the dead’s having lived somehow exempted them from a tax status that was in the strictest sense exclusive. No one was suggesting that it was not one of the axioms of history that, in order to have died, one must have first been alive for a time; and yet this “having been alive for a time” did not confer upon the dead the properties that are, quite demonstrably, within the purview of those who were still living (and who, by that property, had not yet been annihilated)—the shifting of eyebrows, for instance, or the moving of one’s limbs without the aid of an accomplice, or the holding forth amicably on topics of interest to agreeable gentlemen everywhere, or …active measures in the memories and pre-cognitive spaces of an all-too-impressionable public life, and so forth. No, it was absurd to call “dead” that which continued to color the thinking and pronouncements of agreeable gentlemen everywhere. Even supposing the names of the dead were allowed, by some accident of bookkeeping, to persist beyond the death of their referents, merely by their having persisted on certain municipal tax rolls, for instance, this did not imply that the referent persisted, or that any connection between referent and name persisted, by which means the living could “remember” the annihilated soul, invoke their memory at political meetings, and such. For it was plain to see that No, these were apes and imposters of the dead, still subject to annihilation, with names that could be written down and compiled into lists.
But Chichikov knew that the dead could not be killed again. You could not exhume the dead and induce a second death upon their already dead cadavers.
and that, by that byzantine logic, the dead had  had not never existed at any point in time
He knew, on the one hand, that the dead, merely by their being dead, did not vanish altogether.  The dead left a mark—the little divot of air marking their having once been alive—and that this was very different from people who didn’t exist.

 [seed form of this byzantine logic: art. 128 vs. US Institute for Peace , which emerges from the depths of the novel’s subconscious much later on.]
Now the coals
Now the coals had died down, and the pipe smoke rose and took unknown shapes in the darkness above their heads. For a long time now, the mantlepiece clock above the fireplace had been lost in the upturned shadow of the mantle, and Manilov could not tell the hour.  Even so, it had been possible to keep a time of sorts by marking its passage in terms of silent intervals between agreeable commentaries and clever turns of phrase. These silences had gradually dilated,    Manilov made as though to speak and mark the end of another measure of silence, but instead descended into a fit of coughing. Only the dancing pools of shadow were visible on his guest’s face, and not his guest’s face. The eyes of the two gentlemen deepened into little pools of shadow that flickered and steadied by turns, like murder weapons resting at the bottom of remote forest ponds; and Manilov pinched his lapels between thumb and forefinger in a fresh affectation at speech, instead descended into a fit of coughing. Each successive utterance was a mannerly shell of, and difficult to tell apart from, the utterance that preceded it, but had no connection to the previous commentaries, nor to anything else in the world, as regards logic and meaning.
Manilov was able to mark the evening’s passage by the intervals of silence punctuated by amicable utterances.  The successive utterance had little connection to the previous as regards meaning.
Now the coals had died down, and the eyes of the two gentlemen deepened into little pools of shadow that flickered and steadied, like murder weapons resting at the bottom of remote forest ponds; and Manilov pinched his lapels between thumb and forefinger in a fresh affectation at speech, instead descended into a fit of coughing.  For a long time the clock above the fireplace had been lost in the upturned shadow of the mantelpiece, and it had not been possible to tell the hour.  Manilov had maintained a subconscious tally of the evening’s passage in terms of silent intervals between agreeable commentaries and clever turns of phrase.  These silences had gradually dilated,    Manilov made as though to speak and mark the end of another measure of silence, but instead   but was immediately checked by the disturbing sensation of not knowing how long the most recent silence had lasted, not knowing the hour, no longer being able to judge with any certainty for how long he had been staring absently into the consummate darkness.  And instead of the words he had formed his mouth to utter, he choked on a bit of his saliva and descended into a fit of coughing, whence he nearly did not extract himself.  Only the dancing pools of shadow were visible on his guest’s face, and not his guest’s face.

Collected his hands into a little cairn shape atop his knees.













































WE RECOGNIZE on the earth the rolling contours of country fields, the windscorched green and brown tufts of wheat and heather, and their borders of still denser copse, born more of the idea of property than of the earth itself.  Between the masses of landed property run the thin cataracts of road owned by the municipal state, and carved across the particular fields are the foot- and cart-worn paths of the serfs.  At the highest points of the land are perched the manors and mansions of the aristocracy.  Besides these positive aspects, there are, here and there, the numerous absences and silences of little note (in no particular order): no birds singing, no leaves on the trees, no scenes of animals, no centers of social commotion, no souls.
Chichikov pressed is face against the window of the light spring britzka. No souls? Where were the little, smashed roofs of the peasantry? The estates were clear! And yet, who had made those furrows in that field? Who had gathered the hay into the barn over there? This was the distinguishing mark of Rus, setting it apart from other nations. In Rus they had achieved what the Englishman could only dream of: a yeomanry that existed and didn’t exist…. Just out of view, just out of the corner of your eye, in the places where one could not look, were the correct symbolic domain architecture, and also from time to time the things which are not, in the end, actually there.  
Above, clouds pass by in phased banks of disarray—the scattered ranks of some vanquished army—and are the only suggestion to the eyes that time has not stopped [connects with: “but it was easier to stop time”]. Behind this, the pale tablet of sky forced itself onto the literary space in an unending, unwanted tryst, punishing those who gaze up at it with a splitting pain in the forehead. Maybe just one patch of blue sky behind the right shoulder of Christ Pantocrator who offers an enigmatic greeting from the cathedral zenith, framed by spiraling babies and saints, raising his right hand in enigmatic mudra with his fingers. “Is He  flipping us off?” marvels the passing traveler. But no, Christ is not flipping us off.  The aural space, meanwhile, is occupied almost exclusively by the staccato gusts and blusters of the wind which all year does not cease accosting the face of land and people, and even seems to aspire to the totality of silence itself. And in those instances when the wind stops, one is overwhelmed by the silence which is even harder to hear; and to which one cannot close one’s ears.
These were some of the general elements describing, in broad strokes, the ambient sphere of rising action.
Now the mansion appeared atop a knob in the distance, like a fly which suddenly alights atop a heap of shit, and the proprietor of the estate, I believe I already mentioned his name—a certain Monsieur H—k, whom Chichikov had met at the recent governor’s soirée—issued from the door in his pajamas to greet our hero, his pate bared and his carrick thrown devil-may-care over his frock and jacket—clearly, he was impatient to understand something.  He approached Chichikov, who had himself scarcely stepped off of his sideboards, at an urgent pace, but held up at three meters or so, and did not extend his hand in greeting.
“Oh, have you forgotten something?” he asked.
“But I have just gotten here!” replied Chichikov.
“Just gotten where?”
“Here!  Where else?”
“But...”
And the two men let a silence pass between them, each one scouring the other’s countenance for the secret meaning that was at play.  At last, M. H—k broke into laughter.
“Ha!  Such a joker you are, Monsieur Chichikov, dear me!  You really know how to hang noodles from our ears.  And with that revizor face of yours, who would ever know!  Ha ha!”
But Chichikov was not laughing.  “But I’m serious,” he assured him, “I just arrived at your estate now.”
“Ha ha!  Ha!  Ha!  Yes indeed!  I know you’ve just arrived, indeed!  Ha!”
“No but, I’m terribly sorry dear host, it’s not a joke.  You see.  I tell you in all earnestness, with all the sincerity of my being, I have just arrived at your estate.”
“Just arrived?  But…then…are you sure?”
“I’m terribly sorry, but yes sir.”
“But, well then, I suppose it’s possible.”
“I should say so…”
“But, well, then please excuse me.  How embarrassing, if I had known, I would have dressed.  It’s just, the resemblance is striking.  Yes, well, please come in.  And what is your name, good sir?”
“I am Pavel Ivanovich Chichikov.”
	At this the host lay himself gently on the ground and clutched his stomach tightly, kicking at the small stones and rubble of his driveway.  “Haaaa ha!  Haaaaaaaaa ha!  Yes, it was you all along!  Ha!  Ha!  Ho!  Yes, oh dear, I was not wrong!  Ho ho!”
	“But, forgive me, dear Monsieur, I haven’t the faintest clue about what you are implying.”
	“Not the faintest clue!  Haaaaa!—”
	“Please, Monsieur—”
	“Ha ha ha ha!  Ha!”
	“An odd fellow,” Chichikov murmured to himself, and turned to take his departure.  But just as he mounted his britzka, the laughter all at once ceased, and he heard H—k raising himself from the ground; and indeed, turning around again, he saw his host upright, staring quite seriously at the road below.
	“But that is your britzka there,” he pointed, “driving along the road to N.”
	Chichikov looked and saw that it was true.  A light spring britzka, which was not at all unlike his own—indeed, which was exactly like his own, and no different—plied its way down the road to N.
“You see,” said the host, “I thought you were him there, come back for something you’d forgotten.  But now I see that he is quite clearly on his way into town, and has not returned…I mean to say, clearly it is evident now that you are not him, there in that britzka, but an altogether different Pavel Ivanovich Chichikov, here.  Though you are identical in every respect, though you have the same name, the same britzka, the same physiognomy, all this must be pure coincidence…”
“I’m sorry!” declaimed Chichikov indignantly, and took one step backward toward his britzka, then another, quickly, as if the sudden masque of identity was simply too much and he must flee immediately.  But he vacillated, and when the decisive moment had passed he said again, “I’m sorry,” but in a tone resigned to his presence at M. Sobakevich’s estate, “I am not that man.  If his name is also Chichikov, so be it; I am innocent of it.  I have no associations whatsoever with him, whatever the outward parity…”
Monsieur H—k looked up through the little storm of data into Chichikov’s eyes, which surged presently with a tender suffering.  And with these words, our hero closed the remaining three meters and took H—k’s elbow in hand; and H—k offered no resistance, and was led up the front steps and through the door of his mansion.
The chestnut mare named Assessor, meanwhile—who remained harnessed to the britzka all this time—held them in her gaze for the whole time it took them to ascend the steps and enter the house—and then shook her head and let out a snort, as animals do when they have witnessed strange scenes.
Target Class: Hard ICBM Launch Silos and Primary Bomber Bases
Aleysk (SS-18) ICBM Field: 26 SS-18 MOD3 (Satan); 52.28 N Lat. x 82.45 E Long.; Target Hardness- 7000 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Derazhnya (SS-19) ICBM Field: 20 SS-19 MOD3 (Stiletto); 52.28 N Lat. x 82.45 E Long.; Target Hardness- 7000 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Dombarovsky (SS-18) ICBM Field: 175 SS-18 MOD4 (Satan); 50.46 N Lat. x 59.32 E Long.; Target Hardness- 7000 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Imeni Gastello (SS-18) ICBM Field: 18 SS-18 MOD4 (Satan); 51.90 N Lat. x 66.21 E Long.; Target Hardness- 7000 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Tartu AFB: 15 TU-95 Bear G Aircraft; 58.23 N Lat. x 26.43 E Long.; Target Hardness- 40 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Engels AFB: 20 TU-95 Bear G Aircraft; 51.29 N Lat. x 46.12 E Long.; Target Hardness- 40 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Mys Shmidta AFB: 10 TU-26 Backfire Aircraft; 68.53 N Lat. x 179.25 E Long.; Target
Hardness- 40 psi; Background Radiation- Normal
Upon entering the house, Chichikov noticed nothing out of the ordinary by provincial standards.  The entry hall, vestibule and parlor were mostly empty and vacant, although bearing the clear scars of numerous attempts to fill it with life of some sort: a wall covered with portraits and scenes of all sizes which were completely covered over with soot, and which bore various inscriptions at their bases, such as “Zukhov” or “Conference at the Crossing”—but what the conference was all about remained a mystery; everything had to be guessed from a pair of hound legs sticking out at the bottom left corner.  Or, alternately, in the frame next to the “Crossing” stood a greaved pair of slim human legs, beneath which was inscribed in flourishing script something like: “Alexander the Great.”  A number of chairs and tea tables grazed about the center of the carpet, meanwhile, and had even worn through the floral pattern in some places, leaving behind threadbare patches through which the wood floor could be glimpsed.
but I cannot grasp…excuse me…I, of course, could not have received such a brilliant education as is perceivable in your every movement; I have no lofty art of expression...Here it may be…in this explanation just expressed by you…something else is concealed…It may be that you were pleased to express it thus for the beauty of the style?”  “No,” said Chichikov, “I mean the matter just as I stated it—that is, those souls which have died, but who would, nonetheless, be counted on the census as living.”  At all of this M. H—k remained silent for several moments, and brought his hand to his chin, where there was a little beard.  “And for what reasons do you need this, Chichikov?”  “You ask, for what reasons?  These are the reasons:


[falls out of house:]
	But before Chichikov could proceed, he noticed, presently, that he had fallen out of the house. “Blast!”“But…wha—!  It seems that I have fallen out of M. H—k’s house!  Pah! Well, nothing for it: I must once again enter the house!”  And he set out forthright to accomplish his task; but just then a breeze whispered through a tall walnut tree that stood over the corner of the house, and the walnut tree, which though he did not realize or accept it was the projected logic and inevitable course of his neurasthenia, sent down several volleys of spiny walnuts which barred his path, and he was forced to detain his steps.  But the depth of what was hidden beneath all this masque was as though unfathomable, and our hero’s stubbornness was as though inexhaustible; like those who, after the Revolution, seemed so intent on smashing themselves to pieces against the new reality.   He bunched up the collar of his cranberry colored, swallowtail jacket over his head for protection and continued forward, thrusting out his hand in desperate reconnaissance.  But just then the breeze lifted in intensity, and walnuts came blizzarding down upon his position, preventing him from advancing further.  “Blast!” he cursed.  And he peaked out from beneath his dinner jacket to see where he was, but in the same instant a walnut pelted him square in the forehead.  “Ah!” he cried, retreating still further into his dinner jacket.  Now he heard a soft crunching sound from underfoot, and emerging from his dinner jacket he espied that he had entered a small deciduous grove.  “Blast!” he cursed.  He knelt down in the frosty detritus and opened his attaché case, pulling forth a plume and inkwell, and a ledger with the word “Discrepancies” written across the cover, and setting these implements across a tree stump, he turned the ledger to a blank page and began to make an entry.


At last Monsieur Manilov descended into a fit of laughter that was at once, somehow, glib and earnest; and Chichikov joined in with a light chuckle of his own, and the two laughters crescendoed and grew together; while at the same time casting sidelong glances in each other’s direction and raising their glasses into the air. Then the chuckling tapered off and they were once again engulfed in the nothingness whence they had set out. M. Manilov struck a wistful gaze upon his fields, which were visible through the window beneath a light mist.  “And so then, if there are no obstacles, we might proceed then…with the purchase?”  “Purchase?”  “The dead souls, that is…”  “Ah!  But…”  And here Manilov gazed meaningly into Chichikov’s face to catch the ironic intent that was at play.  There was as a matter of fact no such ironic intent, but Manilov ignored this detail…Chichikov swooned and gave such a violent twitch in his seat that he nearly burst the fabric of the cushion beneath him.  Finally, he even gave a little leap after the manner of the goat, who are known to perform such leaps only under the strongest impulses of joy.

ALL AROUND lay a sea of golden gray, which even crested and broke against the little berm of road which the light spring britzka traversed.  At the top of a knoll in the distance, a hound turned placidly about a spot on the ground and lay down.  Behind that, a solitary house rose up into view with bean rows planted in its front yard.  Then, further on, there were some goats being driven over the crest of a hill, with little twitching ears and noses.  Then there were some small houses which emerged from behind the forest and came gradually into view.  Indeed, the little houses themselves resembled a small herd of goats which had just been driven over the hillside and then frozen there by the spell of some Greek god, with little beetling ears and noses that resembled windows and stovepipes.  A settlement of houses came up on the right, presently, with one of the barn doors opened onto a threshing floor, where a pair of women were busy with the harvested sheaves.  Chichikov glimpsed their rosy arms flashing in the low auburn light before they snapped out of view.  Then: In front of one of the houses a mother reached down and scooped up a small child into her arms, heaving her up into the air.  Even at this distance the black hair of the two figures stood out from the black doorway that framed their sudden apparition.  But already the whole scene began to wink at Chichikov through the tall golden-grey grass as his britzka descended into another vale, and was gone.
You looked and looked again.  But what was it?  What was this strange sort of something-or-other that was there.  We listen in for the answer, but no answer comes forth.  “Well I,” pipes up someone sitting on the sofa of the parlor, and immediately remembers they are drunk and falls silent.  But such was Rus!  A laugh and a glimmer in the eyes—and like a racing troika it is gone!  One looks again, but there is nothing.  Only laughter and swirling snow give any evidence that there had been something there—whatever it was—and then the laughter and swirling snow also dissolve and vanish into nothingness.


[corporal:]
Chichikov selected the chair with the most upholstery, behind which a little fire scowled and crackled from the hearthplace, and sat down—immediately he shifted so that he was sitting not in the center of his seat but to one side, with his legs cast out in front of him obliquely; and his hands and kneecaps folded on top of each other so that they formed a delicate cairn shape at their pinnacle, which was very striking to the eye.
But Chichikov’s concentration was boken, presently, by a gentle hissing noise which filled the room, and he looked about himself for several moments afraid that snakes might invade the room.  But then he realized that the hissing noise was coming from exactly the center of his host’s eyebrows, which were shifting slightly to and fro.  Indeed, M. H—k had even transfixed our hero rather sternly in his gaze, and Chichikov began to worry that the light and agreeable mood between them had been soured somehow.  He settled back and cast his gaze about the room to try to restore something of the meaning and congenial atmosphere that had flourished just moments before; he drew in his legs and cast them out again several times, until only the hindmost portion of his posterior remained in contact with the chair.  But in the same instant, M. H—k, too, collected himself unto some inner, private principle; and sensing something of our hero’s inner vacillation, he anticipated him:

The two gentlemen rose and ascended the staircase to the study on the second floor, then, and took their seats at the little green table, where the game of whist was set out.
“How long ago were you so good as to file your census report?”
“For what reasons do you need this, Chichikov?”
Chichikov sat not in the center of his chair, but slightly to one side, with his legs cast out obliquely, at an angle.
“For what reasons do you need this, Chichikov?”
“You ask for what reasons?” picked up Chichikov, but hesitated immediately.  There even appeared on his face a strained expression—the strain of expressing something that is not quite amenable to words—which even made him blush.  And the longer he hesitated, the stronger became the raspy whisper which was emanating from Monsieur H—k’s eyebrows.  The noise, indeed, was on the point of driving our hero out of his mind, when all at once he drew himself up and said:
“These are the reasons: to have in hand the list—the census—of those who were erroneously registered as …to know, that is, which of us are still real, even though we think we do not exist.”
At these words, M. H—k shifted his eyebrows with such fury that they emitted a noise such as is only heard at green tables when a deck of cards is being shuffled; and our hero looked at the cards in his hand to see if someone hadn’t indeed, by some furtive and stealthy gesture, entered the room and shuffled them.  But no, no one had done so, and he smiled amicably.
 “But Chichikov,” cried M. H—k meanwhile, who had stood up from the green table and turned to face the portraits of Nicholas, Zukhov, and Bagration that were on his wall, “that is illegal!”
“Illegal?  But—”
“Mortgaging dead souls to the bank as though they were living—Pah!”
 “Well, as you’ve been so forthcoming, I’ll let you in on a little secret of my own, hm’mmm, a little confession of my own just maybe hmm’mm, indeed!  Oh yes yes, these epaulettes you see here on my shoulders, hmmm, and this Cap’n Crunch hat you see on my head, these are not just leftovers from the campaign of ’12, no no!  And just, h’mm, for your general information, hmm hm’mm, I should like you to know that if this person to whom you are talking, who is standing in my shoes, if he happened to be, it turned out, by the remotest chance an authentic police left-tenant…well, then I can assure you, so that you might not be disuaded from knowing, on that very unlikely occasion, that that putative corporal who we must admit, for all intents and purposes almost certainly does not exist, would in those remotest of circumstances…hmm…”
But H—k presently became so lost in his ironic use of the third conditional that he was unable to distinguish between himself and his ironic portrayal of himself as not himself, and he convulsed briefly in a decrescendo of slathers and murmurs, and fell back into his chair, inviting Chichikov to a game of whist upstairs.
“But my dear host!” exclaimed Chichikov, “we are already playing whist upstairs right now!”


[…Why, just then a literary hack sitting in a coveted departmental chair in some European captial was musing:] But the novel, somehow, is always something else from itself, leaving behind, like footsteps, a trail of dreamy semblances which do not measure up to the whole.  Some will say, surely, that something must be happening in this world, which is only what it is—some sort of loamy development and budding lyrical foment—but it is not even so much loamy development, but rather some sort of primary main thing, some main sort of primary happening thing, which is what it is.  Indeed a novel, and the same is said to be true in painting and sculpture, must be only its authentic self, and not different things that are not the same as what it is.  And something is happening, surely, we must confess: the wind howls and the pine trees give a shudder, the fields of grain crest and surge like an ocean—But everything that is not what the main sort of primary thing is, sweeps to the fore unwanted.  Something, indeed: everyone and everything carries on, but beneath the surface no one can remember what it was.  The primary sort of main thing is gone, suddenly—it was never there—and all of the things that were not the main thing sweep to the fore; the unwanted tide of everything that was absent until then and that did not exist, sweeps to the fore.  It is only natural, then, that the novel, as a form, appears at so many points not to be what it is.  One will say, naturally, but if it is not a novel, then what is it?  If this is not the loamy foment and the majestic lyrical flow, then what is it?  We listen in for the answer, but no answer comes forth.  “Well I,” pipes up someone sitting on the sofa of the parlor, and immediately remembers they are drunk and falls silent.  But such was Rus!  A laugh and a glimmer in the eyes—and like a racing sled it is gone!  One looks again, but there is nothing.  Only laughter and swirling snow give any evidence that there had been something there—whatever it was—and then the laughter and swirling snow also dissolve and vanish into nothingness.


Chichikov drew to the side of the road and descended the light spring britzka; and drew himself up at the edge of the roadside.  He peered into the field; but it was almost—there was something there—he looked again a second and third time: the fields were there.  And there were some trees.  Further on, some goats could be discerned.  Chichikov gazed and gazed into the field, with a certain air that was at once deft, staid, and agreeable; there was a certain flare of the nostrils—but just what the devil was it?  Some remark was called for, some clarification, but no such remark was forthcoming.  Behind him a sudden gust of wind lodged in the high boughs and made a howling, clattering ruckus, and Chichikov turned around to watch the little leaves that still clung to their branches.  He looked up into the last autumnal leaves: they were just little brown and gray leaves, fluttering in the breeze.  He trained his gaze on the little diamond-shaped frames of their intersecting vines and branches, which criss-crossed and intersected to form rotund little diamond frames of sky and leaf, and saw: more intersecting vines and branches, which enclosed further diamonds of sky.  He peered into the little diamond shaped frames of vines and branches.  It was all nameless, of course, made-up nonsense, frozen, dead.  And yet it was all there; and there was no other way to put it than the way it was.  Chichikov staggered backward and vomited briefly in the grass.
After this, the light spring britzka drew up to the steps of the mansion

The two gentlemen swept off across the grass pitch, then, staggering down the little rut of heath, their little hairs swept up and battered about like little sails on the quay, making it difficult for them to keep their footing.  Distant mooing and clatterings of mule hooves reached their ears from two or three directions at once, divided and reconstituted by the wind.  Further on, beyond unwanted outbreaks of copse and forest growth, the cultivated shards swept together into a vast brown sea extending onward through one province after another until—but just until what was not known—following the downward slope of the flowing sheaves of grain where they ran against a broken down fence, and beyond that Chichikov saw a subsequent field extending almost to the horizon where a distant herd of black goats peeked bashfully over the—or no, now he saw correctly, those were the little houses of the serfs’ village.
“Here are my ducks,” said M. H—k somewhat diffidently, as though not quite sure where to begin.
A turkey, meanwhile, who was among the fowl, began bobbing his head up and down meaningly, and slowly accosted our hero.  Chichikov feigned indifference—as when one has been recognized at a crowded gathering by someone one doesn’t wish to talk to.  But then his hand was forced by a sneeze, and the turkey exclaimed something which sounded very much like “God bless you!”—to which Chichikov responded, “Fool!”
“That fence down there,” said Chichikov, pointing; and they staggered down the heath rut toward the low row of stones.
When they reached the little pile of stones, Chichikov pursed his lips and laid his hand on one of the stones with such forthrightness that Monsieur H—k was deeply impressed; he forgot his concern, and also stepped forward, and took a stone in hand, his eyes glazed over with deference.
“This fence needs mending in several places,” he said, “I shall rebuild those storage sheds over there.  And I shall rehabilitate those fields lying fallow over there.  And that area will be cleared for pasture land…”
They stood at an excellent vantage over the land now.  Chichikov saw the trees swell abruptly into the foreground and then recede behind the crest of land behind them, watching them closely.  He saw the trees accreting and gathering into the foreground, and then decrescendoing and vanishing beneath the rising horizon line of wheat sheaves to his right and a little behind him.  There were the intermittent groupings of two or three or, for example, five trees, intermittent at first—indeed the whole of the serfs’ village was enclosed in one such arboreal caesura—and then less intermittent so that it was a forest.  Chichikov threw a furtive glance back at the forest which he had scrutinized before.  Still everything was in place, and he returned his gaze forward.  He swung his head backward again, as if to catch the existence of the forest off guard.  But again he was rebutted by the actual presence of trees and field; and a jackdaw which sat overhead on one of the branches even cawed down mockingly at his vain efforts.  Yes, thought Chichikov as he surveyed the landscape one more time, there was nothing that was not there, that was not somehow present—nothing that would reveal some secret, some special character, that was different from immediate appearances, that had been hidden at first.  No, there was nothing that was not qualitative, that was not, somehow—it all stubbornly refused to be something else besides what it was, no matter how resolutely and meaningly one gazed into the obtained field.  Our hero staggered backwards and paled, and vomited into the tall grasses.
 “And the new chapel will be built on that hillock, over there…” continued M. H—k, meanwhile, oblivious, “…and I shall construct a hanging gardens there on that knoll—”
“Whether you do these things or not is fine by me,” said Chichikov, “but you must always guard against both doing them and not doing them.  That goat, for example, over there, or that grove of trees down there, must not be allowed to be two goats, or two groves of trees.  You can get another goat or plant another grove alongside that one, but just so long as it is a different grove, and not the same as the one that is already there.  If you do get more goats, fine, but you must ensure that they are new and different from the goat you already have.  You must never allow yourself, Monsieur H—k, to come into possession of a goat which is the same as that goat down there.”


The ghosts of the past were harmless digressions; and since the past in which they took place no longer existed, they themselves can no longer be said to have taken place.  Chichikov knew for example that the dead could not suddenly burst out of the earth and come get you, and drag your soul down to hell.  They were not there waiting to reach out their flayed arms and pull up your soul like a little turnip.  Like this, Chichikov’s thoughts went out and peopled the confines of his gaze.  Objects, too, seemed to mingle.  The only problem was whether you were really yourself, or whether you had become the ghost of yourself and were one of the ones who deserved to be dragged down to hell.
After this, the mansion appeared atop a knob in the distance, and gradually came into view.  Three English gardens were planted on the slope, beside which sat a squat gazebo of some brownish color, enclosed, in its turn, within a pentagonal arrangement of lattice gates—a structure, perhaps, with pretensions to being an arboretum of some sort, over which was hung a wooden sign that read: “The Pentagon of Solitary Contemplation.”


Chichikov gave a little laugh and continued striding down the turbulent grain heath, knowing too well the pageantry of meaning and agreeable gentlemen.  Still, it was just the sort of remark that he found paltry, facile—unworthy, at any rate, of the repertoire of agreeable gentlemen.  He could not help that his bile was turned, and he turned and spat briefly, sideways into the wind; and some of the frown that was in his heart found its way up into the corners of his lips, which began twitching sporadically, with the result that there once again appeared on our hero’s face a look of spectacular meaningness, such as can only be seen at Petersburg dinner parties—it appears to be some sort of roguish bemusement at first, but in the next moment God alone can say: it’s not neurasthenia; it’s not epilepsy, nor even some demonstration of magnetic properties—devil knows what it is!  He turned aside and vomited briefly into the heath.



Clinical Preface

Here presented for the first time is the so-called “Dead Souls” manuscript, authored by General Mikhail Tukhachevsky sometime between 1923 and 1931, while he was an intern at the Volokhskaya mental asylum, along the Volga River, near St. Petersburg, Russia.
The manuscript is presented in this easily accessible, “Everyman’s Edition,” without extensive notes or commentary, because it holds something for everyone, from military behavioralists to industrial gematryists.  The commentary and annotated editions are sure to be forthcoming, as this little book will generate much discussion.
Since I am named in the manuscript as one of its primary “characters,” and since my N.E.W. work of the period, here at Arlington, is now common (and declassified) knowledge, I have been asked to write this short preface introducing Level 5 to this remarkable document.
The manuscript here presented was apparently stored away in a ward filing cabinet in the corner of the psychiatrist’s office at Volokhskaya, where it lay preserved and forgotten for over eight decades.  In 1997, during the facility’s conversion to a tourist resort, the file cabinet was moved to the cellar, but the document remained undiscovered. It is only thanks to the recent re-emergence of Soviet Communism and the careful re-expropriation of the Volokhskaya estate that the Dead Souls manuscript ever came to light at all.
From the psychiatric standpoint, however, we have here nothing less than the first concrete example of a phased-compound prismotic event. From the other records that we have been able to retrieve from Volokhskaya, it is clear that Tukhachevsky entered the asylum diagnosed with acute compound schizophrenia (the patient projects a false personality which in turn projects another false personality).  The records also note a major deterioration in Tukhachevsky’s condition during his sophomore year—coinciding with the introduction of certain journal-keeping therapies prescribed by his doctor—but the diagnosis was not modified at any point during Tukhachevsky’s nine years at Volokhskaya.  It is my opinion that in this second year after being committed, Tukhachevsky’s condition deteriorated to what is now called a phased transpersonal event-schizophrenia, or a phased-event compound schizophrenic prismosis, of which the Dead Souls manuscript that follows is the mimetic focal of the phased-compound event cycle.
I make this claim because I treated the patient who was the inverse pole of the transpersonal (and trans-temporal) Tukhachevsky event cycle.  My patient, whose name remains classified, was also a war veteran (of a postmodern American war), and also thought he was Chichikov from Gogol’s novel Dead Souls.  And when he entered the “convalescent” phase of the compound cycle, his secondary projections were the converse of Tukhachevsky’s.  That is to say, whereas Tukhachevsky thought he was returning to sanity as my patient, my patient thought he was returning to sanity as General Tukhachevsy, and he projected the intimate elements of General Tukhachevsky’s life in the same detail that General Tukhachevsky projects certain details of my patient’s life in the manuscript below.  I can only say it is a shame the manuscript did not come to light earlier—it would have been very helpful in understanding the perplexing motives of my own patient, and in avoiding the unfortunate measures we ultimately were forced to take with him.
What about my “role” in the manuscript?  I can affirm only that the clinical mimesis, while not exact, is indeed conspicuous—about as grotesque and conspicuous as its “literary” resemblance to Gogol’s poem.  Beyond that I must conserve my silence. However, I do so only partly to protect the classified information that still surrounds the affair.  There is a better reason, and the sharpest among you in Level 5, after some reflection, will understand what is meant by the silence.

H. H. Harrow, PhD.

Arlington, Virginia
24 November 2029


Ted and Linda are here to pick you up and take you out to lunch.  We have lots to talk about when you get back.”
Chichikov looked around and noticed the reserve of bright blue sky above their heads, restive and empty.  A loud metallic clapping noise penetrated his nerves again and again; an immense American flag beating against the silvery flagpole.  Turning completely around he beheld the massive edifice of the ward, whose edges curved elliptically away and disappeared from view.
“Were at the front of the ward,” said Chichikov.
“That’s correct, Chichikov, and your cousin Ted and his wife Linda are here to take you out to lunch today.  See them there?” said Hank, pointing toward the end of the cement promenade.
“What was it?  What happened to me?” said Chichikov.
“Here they come now.”
Ted and Linda had crossed the parking tarmac and were approaching the wide cement and granite promenade that skirted the entrance to the ward.
“Hey, Chichikov!”
Chichikov spun around and looked beseechingly at Hank—overcome by a giddy, dizzy sensation—that he had to struggle, briefly, just to encompass himself.  He felt a sudden impact against his body, and looked down at the two children who were wrapped around his legs and waist.
“Uncle Chichikov!  Uncle Chichikov!”
“Are you ready to go, Chichikov?” said Ted.
Hank observed quietly all this time, and judged that the tragedies he had touched upon had approximated the reality.
“I think this is all becoming clearer and clearer to you, Chichikov,” said Hank, waving good-bye, rather pleased with himself.
“I would like to visit the Gulf War Memorial, Dr. Hank.”
“Are you ready to go, Chichikov?  Let’s go.  The car’s over there.”
“How are you Chichikov?  So, ready?  We’re gonna pick up Mike and Nancy on the way.”
“Mommy!”
“Daaad!  She keeps hitting…”
“Hey, you two behave now for Uncle Chichikov!”
Chichikov lowered his eyes to the source of the piercing scream, and beheld the blonde eight-year old girl whose face was contorted into a bitter pout.  Our hero limited his gaze to objects which were schematic, which did not necessarily have to be seen in order to already be there; objects whose connections with the surrounding context were not complicated, or where there weren’t even any connections in the first place—
“Yeah, the car’s just over here.  So, what Kevin Costner does is he buys a big farm out in Iowa, and you he means business—you know this guy’s not messing around, because of how much money he’s going to payTarget Class: Hard ICBM Launch Silos + Combat Support Assets:How’s that lobster, Ted? Just great.  What happens is he gets captured by the enemy in the battle of Hill 367, and the NVA take him back to a hidden village, where they torture him and keep him prisoner for ten months.  But wasn’t he a Gulf War veteran, Ted?  That’s what I didn’t get.  How do the two tours get reconciled?  Or did you just think that he could be both in the Gulf War and the Vietnam War?  Miller What happens is that the psychiatrist is lying to Kevin Costner, because the truth is that Kevin Costner is part of a secret Army Project, and the psychiatrist wants Kevin Costner to think that he was in a different war from his old buddy played by Bruce Willis, so that they don’t get together and realize they were in the same war, and begin making other connections and remembering the secret Army Project.  Little by little you realize that the psychiatrist is lying to Kevin Costner, played by Liam Nelson, and that he was actually in the same war as Bruce Willis, and that the story which keeps coming up, which Kevin Costner just can’t shake from his head, that he had been captured by the NVA after a firefight on Hill 367 and taken to a village to heal for ten months, turns out to be the story of his comrade, Bruce Willis.  Yeah because there’s that part where Kevin Costner keeps asking Bruce Willis to talk about his experiences, without any success, and then suddenly it turns out that the story which he has told the psychiatrist over and over again, thinking it was his own, is the story of Bruce Willis.  You thought that Bruce Willis had just been reluctant to tell his story, because he didn’t want to go back into all that trauma, but in fact he had transmitted his story to Kevin Costner, and Kevin Costner had just not remembered, because he was still in that mental state where he wasn’t always conscious of what was going on around him, or when it was going on, or what he was doing, because he’s still under the spell of the dementia; and he’s still at a point of convalescence where doesn’t become conscious of many things that are going on around him until later on, when they appear to him in the guise of some other situation or conversation, in an oblique fashion which spares him a direct confrontation with the traumatic contents.  What happens is that Nick Nolte is wounded in the firefight, and the rest of his corps is able to fall back safely, but Nick Nolte is wounded twice in the legs, and so he gets captured by the NVA and taken to a hidden village, from which he is to be taken to a POW camp as soon as he can walk again.  His wounds are cleaned and dressed, and it is clear that it will take several weeks, perhaps months, for the wounds to heal completely.  The rest of the cadre thinks they should just kill him and move on, but the commander overrules them, and allows Nick Nolte to heal.  But an interesting transformation begins to take place in Nick Notle’s heart, in the meantime.  He doesn’t want to kill anymore; he decides he won’t return to his corps when he heals.  He decides to leave war forever.  The months pass by, and the NVA unit commander, a certain Thuy x       ddd, sees that the day is approaching when he will be healthy enough to be transferred to the POW camp.  And you can tell that she senses something of his inner transformation, and is influenced by it.  They never exchange a word, but you can tell that a secret rapport is establishing itself between them.  The rest of the cadre are growing restless and suspicious.  Thuy must make a decision.  She announces that they will begin moving the prisoner to the POW camp on the following day—but in secret she plans to help him escape before dawn.  However, before night falls, Chichikov’s corps arrives, and in the mad rush that follows, Thuy gives Nick Nolte something, it’s not clear what—a gift.  You can really just tell that John Travolta is a genius.  Kissinger convinced Nixon to widen the bombing to Laos and Cambodia.  During one six-month period in 1973 alone, US B-52s dropped 240,000 short tons of bombs across rural Cambodia, 50% more than the total tonnage dropped on Japan during WWII, or the equivalent of five Hiroshima bombs.  The Sihanouk government was overthrown and the conditions ripened for the Khmer Rouge to take control.  By the time Pol Pot assumed power in 1975, US bombing had killed 600,000 peasants directly, plus another 1 million by famine resulting from the bombing, and had produced 2 million refugees.  In Laos it is estimated that 350,000 were killed.  To this day, about a thousand Laotian and Cambodian farmers per year are killed by residual, unexploded bomblets, which are manufactured by Boeing with a failure-to-explode rate of 30%.  Taking over the bloodshed, the Khmer Rouge then murdered another million of their countrymen over the course of the remainder of the decade, supplied by Chinese arms via Thailand.  The US gave tacit support to the regime during this period, “winking publicly” as the Chinese underwrote the holocaust (as President Carter’s National Security Adviser, Zbigniew Brzezinski, confessed in 1981).  National Security Adviser, Zbigniew Brzezinski, confessed in 1981 that the Carter Administration had “encouraged the Chinese to support Pol Pot,” during this period, and that the US “winked publicly” as the Chinese underwrote the holocaust.  At last, the Vietnamese army, after suffering repeated Khmer Rouge cross-border raids, sent their army into Cambodia and put an end to the regime in 1979.  In November 1980, Deputy Director Ray Cline, on a clandestine mission to make direct contact with Pol Pot at his base-in-exile.  President-elect Reagan sent a foreign policy adviser, former CIA Deputy Director Ray Cline, on a clandestine mission to make direct contact with Pol Pot at his base-in-exile.  Within the year, 50 CIA agents were stationed in Bangkok and along the Thai-Cambodia border, ostensibly under the name “Kampuchean Emergency Group,” to “monitor the distribution of humanitarian aid” to Cambodian war refugees being carried out by the World Food Program.  But in fact the Kampuchean Emergency Group’s real mandate was (between 1979 and 1981) to redirect humanitarian aid to sustain Pol Pot and the Khmer Rouge who were hiding in the jungle.  U.S. aid to the Khmer Rouge also took more direct forms: from 1980 to 1986 Reagan devoted $85 million to the rehabilitation of Pol Pot’s forces.  Reagan also ensured that for the duration of the Reagan Administration the Khmer Rouge kept its seat in the U.N., and that the official government in Phnom Penh, meanwhile, was barred from all international agreements on trade and communications, and denied aid even by the World Health Organization.  In 1982 the two party “Coalition of the Democratic Government of Kampuchea” was invented.  But the Khmer Rouge controlled both parties, no elections were held, and the new guise of “Coalition” only permitted the US Kampuchean Emergency Group, which also changed its name to the Kampuchean Working Group, to begin in 1987 providing battle plans, military equipment, and satellite intelligence to the Khmer Rouge under the pretence of assisting non-Khmer Rouge “resistance forces.”  But Prince Sihanouk’s son 09mself, Norodom Ranariddh, acknowledged that the “major attacking forces” were always the Khmer Rouge, whose victories were “celebrated as our own.”  During this period, Congress unleashed an estimated $24 million in overt and covert aid.  Weapons made in the US, West Germany, and Sweden, were passed through  Singapore or manufactured there under license by Chartered Industries, which is owned by the Singaporean Government, and then sent on to the Khmer Rouge with logistical support from the Thai army Task Force 80.  Congress halted funding in 1990, but because weapons could be produced in nearby Singapore where they were difficult to detect, President Bush Sr. was able to continue supplying the Khmer Rouge in secret, although for how long and to what extent remains uncertain.  The Khmer Rouge did not lose its seat in the UN until 1993.  Remnants of Chiang Kai-shek’s Guomindang army, fleeing to Burma, supported themselves by expropriating the local opium harvest for sale in Thailand.  They sold directly to General Phao Siyanan, head of the Thai police, who governed the largest narco-trafficking syndicate in his country.  When the CIA began organizing Guomindang units for raids into China in 1950, they also began providing General Phao with naval vessels, armored vehicles, aircraft, hundreds of covert and overt advisers; and in 1954 the US Secretary of the Army awarded him the Legion of Merit for “exceptionally meritorious service.”  The CIA also used the opium trade to fund the formation in 1960 of an anti-communist army in Laos under General Yang Pao, whose members were recruited from the native Hmong people of that region.  The CIA furnished logistical support, including US transport aircraft and pilots—“Air America”—to deliver the narcotics to market.  Heroin laboratories sprang up throughout Southeast Asia during this period, many in areas controlled by paramilitary groups supported by the CIA.  The US Bureau of Narcotics reports that General Pao was even operating a lab in Long Tien, where the CIA had its Laos headquarters.  Toward the late sixties, the keenest entrepreneurs recognized their primary market in the huge buildup of US troops in Vietnam, and by 1971, about one-third of GIs were hooked on high purity heroin.  Heroin traffic in South Vietnam was dominated by the air force under Vice President Nguyen Cao Ky, the civil bureaucracy under Premier Tran Thien Khiem, and the army-navy and National Assembly under the direct influence of President Nguyen Van Thieu.  Ky and Thieu, for example, financed their election campaigns with drug money.  With Thieu’s victory, the South Vietnamese army became the American GIs’ prime suppliers of high purity heroin.  So then what Kevin Costner does then, after he’s returned home, is he is entered into the psychiatric ward at the Arlington Veterans’ home, and then he tries to work out the details with the ward psychiatrist.  Yeah, I remember that scene when Kevin Costner goes like, “After the crash I was taken prisoner by the NVA, but they treated me fdff							f and took me to the hidden village of N. and dressed my wounds.  I recovered there for like four months, I think it was.”  “Yeah, and Hank, the psychiatrist, goes like: ‘No, Chichikov, after your chopper crashed, you were rescued immediately by special forces.  You healed at Saigon hospital.  And what these new documents say here is that you were transferred to light guard duty at an outpost on Hill 47.’”  “But where was he sent after my MTT indoctrination at Op Center Echo?”  He goes like, no, my chopper crashed on Hill 47.  “No, it was the customs house that was on Hill 47.  You crashed thirty clicks south of Hill 367.”  With Hank he asks, in that all-important scene: “After I crashed on Hill 47,  I think I was captured by an NVA commander, who was then captured after s d  d f f”   “After your chopper crashed, you were rescued immediately along with the rest of your unit.  You healed at the hospital in Saigon.  Then you were listed MIA; your identity was classified, and you were sent to the customs house on Hill 47b to serve light guard duty.”  “But Chichikov, you were rescued by special forces immediately after the chopper crash.  Chichikov goes like: I think it would help, Dr. Hank, if I could visit the Gulf War Memorial.  Yeah.  Most officers who were involved in such massacres as the massacre at Cuarto Pueblo, or Agua Fria, El Mozote, Santiago Atitlan, Xaman, Ixcan, Acul, La Joya, Los Toriles, Dili, Kraras, Jocote Armirillo, Cerro Pando, Joateca, Rancheria, Rio Sumpul, El Calabazo, Los Dos Erres, were applying methods which they learned at the U.S. Army School of the Americas.  During Ambassador Stroock’s tenure in the early 1990s, Guatemalan officers who had conducted such massacres were actually 0nvited to teach classes at the School of 0he 0mericas.  The 1993 U.N. Truth Commission found that Chichikovo D’Aubuisson, then an Army Major, had given the order to kill Archbishop Romero, including precise instructions on how to organize and supervise the event.  The Commission has also found that the Supreme Court has since prevented the extradition of former Captain Saravia, actively involved in the murder, from the U.S., effectively granting impunity to everyone who was involved in the crime.  D’Aubuisson, and many of his colleagues had been trained at the US Army School of the Americas (USARSA or SOA), now known as the Western Hemisphere Institute for Security Cooperation (WHISC or WHINSEC), in Ft. Benning, Georgia.  In the Ixil region alone 70%-90% of the villages were burnt to the ground.  It is a universally accepted premise that the individual is the subject of any criminal situation, since humans alone possess will and can therefore take decisions based on will: it is individuals that commit crimes, not the institutions they have created.  As a result, it is to individuals and not their institutions that the correspondingpenalties established by law must be applied.   124. Without prejudice to the fact that the active subjects are the intellectual and material authors of the crimes…the State is also responsible, because the majority of these acts were the product of a policy pre-established by a command superior to the material perpetrators.   e49s2:t/:ppt:Archbishop of Guatemala, Juan Gerardi, was murdered at his home on April 26, 1998 by graduates of the US School of the Americas.  Government pressure has led the case to be closed unsolved.  Archbishop Isaias Duarte of Colombia was murdered on March 17, 2002 by graduates of the US School of the Americas in Fort Benning Georgia.  19 of the 26 men involved in the 1989 assassination of 6 Jesuit scholars in San Salvador were graduates of the US School of the Americas, now known as the Western Hemisphere Institute for Security Cooperation, located at Fort Benning Georgia.  The rape and murder of four Ursuline nuns in December 1980 was the work of officers who are graduates of the US School of the Americas, which was originally located in the Canal Zone, but has since been moved to Fort Benning, Georgia, and renamed the Western Hemispheric Institute for Security Cooperation (WHINSEC or WHISC).  Not a single one of these murderers has been sentenced for their crimes.  While Tom Stroock was Ambassador, some of the Guatemalan officers who had carried forth the genocide of Mayans even came to teach classes at USARSA (now WHINSEC or WHISC).  sent in to Guatemala found t978 90% of the recorded atrocities  978 ee 8s pp r ed by0U0900990ary intellig0nc6 and/or yrt7n89g and w0a090s9materiel.   Yu y e  lurality o567he co89678605 officers had been train5675t t0987S\The U.N. Truth Commission sent in to Guatemala found that 90% of the recorded atrocities had been supported by US military intelligence and/or training and weapons materiel.  A large plurality of the commanding officers had been trained at the US Army School of the Americas, which was at that time located in the Canal Zone in Panama, but has now been moved located to Ft. Benning, Georgia, under the new name of the Western Hemisphere Institute for Security Cooperation.  From 1983-1886, the Reagan Administration set up Otto Reich in the Office of Public Diplomacy to direct the media’s attention away from these operations.  But New York Times reporter LeMoyne traveled to El Salvador to see things firsthand.  He broke the story on June 5, 1988.  Later the same year CIA Deputy Director for Operations Richard Stolz testified before a Senate Select Intelligence committee that between February 8 and March 13 the CIA had indeed trained the officers involved in the torture of Ines Murillo, including 00ballero, Regalatta, as well as many other Hondurans officers not involved in the0incident, in intelligence and counter-intelligenc.  In 1988, the CIA Deputy Director for Operations Richard Stolz testified before a Senate Select Intelligence committee that between February 8 and March 13 the CIA had trained the officers involved in the torture of Ines Murillo, including Caballero, Regalatta, as well as many other Honduran officers not directly involved in the incident, in intelligence and counter-intelligence.  In Acul, the congregation refused to flee, and was machine-gunned in the church.  Manuel Noriega graduated from the US Army School of the Americas with outstanding marks in 1967.  In 1970 it was George Bush Sr. (then CIA Director) put Noriega on the CIA payroll to the tune of $100,000 per year.  In 1971 the U.S. Bureau of Narcotics had hard evidence that Noriega was smuggling drugs.  But Bush Sr. maintained good relations with Noriega throughout the period, ensuring that drugs produced in South America were shipped safely through Panama to market in the U.S., in effect underwriting the crack-cocaine epidemic of the 1980s which Reagan so ostensibly fought against.  When Lemoyne’s article hit the press in 1988 Congress placed an immediate ban on military aid to the Contras; and Reagan was forced to rely more heavily than ever on Noriega and the revenues generated by the crack-cocaine epidemic in America’s urban centers to continue funding the Contra army.  But drug profits alone were not enough, and Reagan had to turn to other sources.  He began selling weapons covertly to a number of different clients, most notably his enemy Iran.  Among Reagan’s clients at this time was Osama bin-Laden.,blindfolded, stripped, sexually molested.  The suspect is fed nothing except raw birds; cold water is poured on the suspect’s head every ten minutes to ensure that sleep is impossible.  Forty-eight of the officers cited for human rights violations by the El Salvadoran U.N. Truth Commission had been trained by the U.S. (at USARSA, now known as WHISC or WHINSEC).  President Sukarno was re-elected in 1955, despite intense efforts by the CIA to defraud the elections and to inundate the opposition Masjumi party with funding.  In 1956 Frank Wisner, Deputy Director of Covert Operations, is on record as saying, “I think it’s time we held Sukarno’s feet to the fire.”  In Kennedy’s and Macmillan’s opinion, Sukarno was too lenient toward the Indonesian Communist Party (PKI).  They set about creating the conditions for an insurgency, including an abortive effort to forge a porn film suggesting that Sukarno was under the spell of a Soviet seductress.  In November 1957, they received the go ahead from the National Security Council’s Special Group to set up training bases in the Philippines and to prepare airstrips on various islands surrounding Java and Sumatra for bombing and transport missions.  The US Army began training and equipping a mercenary force of Indonesians, Filipinos, Taiwanese, and Americans, numbering in the tens of thousands; and the Air Force contributed 15 B-26 bombers after “sanitizing” them (removing their US insignia).  Headquarters for the operation  were set up in Singapore.  Navy submarines deployed over the beach parties on the shores of Sumatra, carrying supplies and communications equipment.  US Air Force transports parachuted thousands of weapons across the archipelago.  The “rebellion” broke out, in fits and starts, in early 1958, supported by the sanitized B-26 ghost planes.  But the insurgency was unable to overwhelm the Indonesian army; and when ghost pilot Allen Pope was shot down and captured on May 9th, the whole cover was blown.  The CIA abandoned the pretend rebellion to fend for itself, and moved the focus of its efforts once again to Indonesian politics, particularly to the consolidation of the Army as a politically charged entity.  1,200 officers were invited by the US government to study at American universities.  One of these, General Suwarto, who had also, during his period of “study” in the US, been mentored by RAND Corp’s Guy Pauker, founded, upon his return, the Indonesian Army Staff and Command School, or SESKOAD.  Major General Suharto began studies at SESKOAD some time in the early sixties.  The activities and organization of SESKOAD were based on the Army’s new “Doctrine of Territorial Warfare” which was being formulated by Suwarto and his colleagues toward the end of the decade.  In accordance with the Doctrine of Territorial Warfare, SESKOAD officers were trained not only in counterinsurgency, but in economics and administration, and were generally prepared to fulfill the functions of a civilian state.  A “civic missions” program was also initiated under SESKOAD, whereby the Army was able to project its presence—its surveillance and political influence—across the breadth of Indonesian society, extending in some cases down to the village level.  President Kennedy and Congress shared an almost paternal enthusiasm for the civic missions program, and in 1962, acting on a State Department recommendation authored in part by Guy Pauker, they set up a MILTAG group (Military Training Advisory Group) in Jakarta in order to directly administer the program.  Meanwhile, as would happen later on in Chile, all economic aid was shifted from the legally constituted, democratically elected government of Indonesia, to the growing dissident elements within the Army.  During the period 1962-1965, Congress approved $39.5 million in military aid to these elements (compared to just $28.3 million for the period 1949-1961).  A June 1962 CIA memo from which the author’s name is deleted confirms that President Kennedy, together with British Prime Minister Macmillan had “agreed to liquidate President Sukarno, depending on the situation and available opportunities.”  In the private sector as well, US oil companies Caltex and Stanvec shifted payment of royalties from the government to dissident-owned companies, such as Permina, headed by General Ibnu Sutowo, (a later close ally to Suharto) and Pertamin, led by Chaerul Saleh, (an anti-PKI politician).  On October 5th, 1965, a group of junior officers from units under Suharto's command killed six high ranking generals in Jakarta.  The officers claimed that they were preempting a coup against President Sukarno, but in fact they murdered precisely the six generals most likely to defend the President.  In a maneuver that was originally seen in Colombia in 1948 (where one million were killed), and that would soon be imitated in Chile, the Congo, Haiti, and Central America, Suharto seized the opportunity to blame the communists for the generals’ murders and take military control of the government under the pretense that he was protecting President Sukarno and the status quo.  Six months later he had forced Sukarno out of office and began the bloody crackdown on the civilian population.  Aside from the “civic missions,” which served as the power infrastructure for the holocaust, the US government also contributed jeeps, radios, and other crucial logistical support, and—through the US Embassy—the names of suspected PKI members, who were then hunted down and killed.  At least some 5,000 civilians are known to have been killed because their names appeared on the lists which the US Embassy passed on to Suharto.  About one million civilians were killed in total when the bloodbath winded down.  Roger Martens, one of the diplomats working in the Political Section of the Embassy at the time and who was involved in the effort, told the Washington Post in 1990, “It really was a big help to the army.  I probably have a lot of blood on my hands, but that’s not all bad.”  Madonna got best actress.  On December 6, Kissinger assured Suharto that East Timor was not a policy issue for the US.  On December 7, Suharto invaded East Timor.  The U.N. Security Council quickly condemned the invasion and ordered Indonesia to withdraw, but the US Ambassador to the U.N., Daniel Patrick Moynihan, vetoed the motion.  As he says in his memoirs, “The United States wished things to turn out as they did, and worked to bring this about.  The Department of State desired that the United Nations prove utterly ineffective in whatever measures it undertook.  This task was given to me, and I carried it forward with no inconsiderable success.”  Within two months, Moynihan informs us, 60,000 East Timorese had been killed.  From 1977-78, receiving a boost in military aid from Carter’s “Human Rights Administration,” the army launched a sustained offensive on East Timor’s last mountain redoubts, slaughtering 200,000 or nearly a third of the population.  In subsequent years, the US, with assistance from Australia and later Britain, trained the dreaded Kopassus corps, which has authored the majority and most heinous of the atrocities.  In 1981, the US trained forces subjected the population to a forced march across the island, raping, torturing, and killing thousands, including elderly and children, along the way.  In 1983, the army annihilated the East Timorese village of Kraras, killing about 300.  In 1991, Kopassus troops gunned down 271 civilians, including many schoolchildren, during a funeral procession at Santa Cruz Cemetery in Dili; and after the initial massacre, Kopassus soldiers entered hospitals and killed the wounded.  Under Suharto, massacres like this occurred in the hundreds throughout the 1980s and 1990s, and were not limited to the East Timor conflict.  The Santa Cruz massacre was caught on film, and subsequent international outrage forced the US, Britain, and Australia to shift military support, particularly for Kopassus training, to covert channels.  But, nonetheless, as late as 1995 Suharto was cordially welcomed into the White House, and a senior Clinton aide was quoted as calling him “our kind of guy.”  Popular resistance forced Suharto to flee in May 1998.  He was replaced with interim President Habibie, a civilian, who announced a referendum in which the East Timorese would choose between independence or incorporation into Indonesia.  Despite a massacre of 3,500 East Timorese civilians in the summer months leading up to the referendum, the East Timorese turned out in strength and voted overwhelmingly for independence.  Even before the call for referendum, the army had begun recruiting militias from West Timor and had deployed its Kopassus troops nearby.  There were calls from the international community for an independent security force to protect the East Timorese from the imminent onslaught.  Instead, Clinton ordered joint training sessions with Kopassus units in Australia on August 25, just days before the referendum.  The training was put to efficient use after the vote, as the soldiers killed some 10,000 civilians in the first two weeks alone.  It is not clear how many in total were killed by the time this latest wave of atrocities finally subsided.  Reagan sent in 25,000 marines (against 710 construction workers) on October 25, 1984 and overthrew the democratically elected government of Granada.  Father Jean-Bertrand Aristide pointed out that since 1980 the US had bequeathed Haiti $200 million per year, and yet during this same period (1980-90) the per capita wealth of the nation had fallen by 40%.  Military aid to Jean-Claude “Baby Doc” Duvalier’s counter-insurgency forces in Haiti was channelled through Israel to avoid embarrassing questions in Washington.  When popular resistance forced Baby-Doc to flee in 1986 aboard a US fighter jet, the US resumed overt assistance, delivering $30 million of hardware and training within four months.  In the period leading up to the November 1987 elections the military used this aid, in concert with rural US “humanitarian” aid missions, to intimidate voters toward their candidate, murdering more civilians in the process than during the entire 15 years of Baby Doc’s presidency.  It was during this period that Father Jean-Bertrand Aristide first appeared in the American press, when he criticised the military’s domination of the elections and called upon his congregation—the poorest of the poor, living in the slums of Haiti—to boycott the election process altogether.  President Reagan privately labelled him a communist, and Assistant Secretary of State for Inter-American Affairs Elliott Abrams openly attacked him in a letter to Time Magazine, in which he also praised the Haitian military dictatorship.  The elections, postponed to January by violence, were patently fraudulent, Avril.  Popular resistance forced Avril to flee, once again by means of a US jet.  Political upheaval returned suddenly to the country in early 2004, when Duvalier’s butchers began agitating for Aristide’s overthrow.  US marines were deployed to “stabilize the situation,” which resulted in Aristide’s being forced out of the country.  A US diplomat simply told Aristide that his security detail was being withdrawn, and that US marines were entering the palace.  The Bush Jr. Administration claimed to have evacuated him for his own safety.  But in Aristide’s own words the operation was a “coup” and he was “kidnapped.”  Go to www.disney.com.  The US took Iraq off of the State Department’s “States which Sponsor Terrorism” list in 1980 in order to begin selling them illegal chemical and biological weapons, which Sadam eventually used against Iran and his own people.  The US, with strong collaboration from the press, tried to make the chemical attacks look like Iran’s doing.  In 1987 Sadam attacked a US naval vessel, the USS Stark, killing 37 U.S. crewmembers, with impunity.  Just before the invasion of Kuwait, a high-level Senate delegation headed by Bob Dole visited Sadam and assured him that any critical voices he heard in the press did not reflect the President’s genuine sentiment toward him.  92% of the 75,000 killed over the twelve year period were found to be attributable to the Army.  God needs the people themselves to save the world….  The world of the poor teaches us that liberation will arrive only when the poor are not simply on the receiving end of hand-outs from governments or churches, but when they themselves are the masters and protagonists of their own struggle for liberation.  US Marines had occupied Nicaragua from 1912 to 1934, and then supported the Somoza dictatorship from 1934 to 1979.  During the Somoza regime, 4,700 army officers came to study at the US Army School of the Americas in order to put down civil resistance to the dictatorship.  In 1979 the Sandinista National Liberation Front (FSLN) overthrew the 45 year tyranny and held the first democratic elections in the nation’s history in 1983.  In the meantime they began building schools, roads, hospitals, and redistributing land, of which, during the Somoza regime, the richest 1% of the population had owned 50%.  This was unacceptable to the Reagan Administration, which in 1980 recruited the remnants of Somoza’s National Guard, and moulded them into a trained and equipped mercenary force called the “Contras.”  The Contras were landed on the east coast of Nicaragua and it was announced that “freedom-fighters” had spontaneously begun fighting against the Sandanista government.  In 1984 the US Navy mined Nicaragua’s harbours.  A newspaper was created and funded by the CIA—La Prensa—which published (and continues to publish) slanderous lies about the FSLN.  Nicaragua took its case to the World Court, and in 1986 the Court ruled in its favour, ordering the US to pay damages of $million.  The US continues to stand in material breach of this verdict.  During the 2001 elections, US Ambassador Garza appeared before the press surrounded by US military officers dressed in combat fatigues and warned the Nicaraguan people that the U.S. would “not look kindly upon” a Sandanista result in the elections.  In the same breath, and apparently without any intended irony, he then called on the Sandanista party to “embrace democratic policies.”  The Sandanistas are responsible for the first democratic elections in the country’s history, and for the first peaceful, democratic transition of power from one democratically elected administration to another.  The U.S., by contrast, trained 4,700 officers over the course of two decades with the precise aim of preventing democratic elections from ever taking place.  Training of Nicaraguan officers at WHINSEC resumed the same year.  The manual “Psychological Operations in Guerrilla Warfare,” published by the U.S. School of the Americas, was distributed in Nicaragua in 1983.  Among its contents were instructions on torture and how to have a fellow soldier killed and then turned into a martyr.  Kaibil units were trained by the Green Beret.  Training of counter-insurgency forces included killing animals, eating them raw, and drinking their blood “to demonstrate courage.”  During massacres, civilian victims were made to mutilate the corpses of their friends and family, and to torture, rape, and kill those still alive, before themselves being killed.  The Army entered the town of Cuarto Pueblo on March 13, 1982, at the hour of the morning mass.  The lieutenant drew up his troops and assured them that the civilians of the town were guerrillas, and that “thanks to the U.S., our soldiers won’t be cut down.”  They then went systematically through the town, taking people from their houses or places of work and shooting them.  When they entered the church, the congregation refused to flee and were machine gunned where they stood.  Small children were gathered and corralled into a shed, and then soldiers machine gunned the shed until all of the children were dead.  Even as the corpses were heaped into piles and burnt, the young women of the town were made to cook meals for the soldiers, and were then raped once the meal was finished, and then killed and thrown onto the pyres.  324 were massacred in total, over a three day period.  The murder of Archibishop Oscar Romero as he gave mass on March 3, 1980, was planned and executed by graduates of the U.S. Army School of the Americas.  19 of the 26 soldiers and officers involved in the planning and execution of the 1989 murder of six Jesuit priests in San Salvador had been trained at USARSA.  The murder of Archbishop Juan Gerardi outside his home in Guatemala on April 26, 1998, was also carried out by graduates of the U.S. Army School of the Americas.  The murder of Colombian Archbishop Isaias Duarte on March 17, 2002, was also carried out by graduates of the U.S. Army School of the Americas.  The torture, rape, murder, and mutilation of three nuns and one lay missionary in Nicaragua in 1980 was also planned and executed by graduates of the U.S. Army School of the Americas.  The rape and torture of an Ursuline nun in Guatemala was carried out by trainees from the U.S. Army School of the Americas, now known as the Western Hemisphere Institute for Security Cooperation (WHINSEC or WHISC), located at Ft. Benning, Georgia.
Perception is aphoristic, disjointed, fragmentary, not unlike the mirror you broke in the Rec Hall during our last Literary Night, Chichikov.  Dementia is often compared to a shattered mirror:  The reality remains the same, but the perception is shattered into thousands of fragments and episodes which are so many repetitions of each other.  In an unbroken mirror, objects are reflected in their completeness, and then a new object can be placed before the mirror for reflection.  In a demented mind, however, the mirror has been shattered—against the object, if you will, which is in this case the suppressed, traumatic contents.  And the dementia holds up one shard, then another, to the same suppressed object of perception, trying to get the shard to reflect something else, anything else besides what is there—and, failing and casting away the shard in disgust, which breaks into more pieces.
	The dementia holds up another shard to the same reality again and again, in different shades and different angles, and in the process different aspects and nuances of the repressed trauma are uncovered and come to light.  But the reality remains the reality.
	The dementia tries to get the reality to be different from what it is.  It holds up different shards of different shapes and sizes, in different shades and angles, and so your thinking becomes repetitive, episodic, disjointed.  Or rather your thinking, your perception, your process of apprehending what is around you, more and more assumes the form of an episode repeating itself again and again in slightly different guises which give an impression that some sort of overall progress is being made.  That the fragments are adding up to some totality, but in fact it is only the same shard of quicksilver being held up again and again, the same episode.
	But, as in the mirror, it is not the fragments in themselves that will eventually make sense, but the spaces in between them—even if you are one day successful in remembering all the facts of your past, and can line them up one after the other, they will have little more meaning than when they were forgotten if you do not understand the connection between them.
	There is always something missing from your perception, which you go filling in little by little—but only after the fact.


Chichikov knew that …aple, oak, and birch leaves fell uniformly to a crimson and golden carpet that covered the forest floor; and Chichikov beheld the swirling lattices of crisscrossing trajectories of autumn leaves with flat affect. The room that enclosed him was featureless and remained unfamiliar to him, but threatened to become familiar each time he allowed his gaze to rest in any single place for more than a few seconds. This was the solace he found in the staid business of falling autumn leaves crisscrossing at scalene angles, ordered but unrepeating, an argument against (re-)collections of components equipped with properties of coherence and consecutiveness, and hence against remembrance, which he knew was a subset of these, by which the passage of time itself was disabled, and with it the forces of remembrance disarmed. The point of his every gesture, physical or mental, was to resist the tide of cognition welling up within—the recognition of suppressed contents, the connecting of dots, the identification of patterns, correlations, textures, tessellations, the gathering of random shards of quicksilver into coherent mirrors—in a phrase: the firing of neurons. His error all along had been of finding a way to disable the decipher-drive of consciousness, when all that was needed was to disable time.  He had found this window, at least, of falling leaves, by which he could turn off time for himself.  But he knew the tide of cognition arose from without too. Somebody would call at the door, usher him to his appointments and evaluations with Dr. Hank. He allowed himself to fantasize that he would just invite whoever came for him to look out the window, and watch their intentions and any recollection of who they were and what they had been sent to accomplish come unframed, just as his own notions of himself and of “what happened” had come unframed, and then wait for the next person to come for the one who had been sent and entrance them too, and so on with the next one and the next, until time had stopped for the entire world. By modern standards, this was not in fact an outrageous idea, and may have worked had it not been for his own diffidence in the plan.
	Chichikov knew that there was a difference between depictions of things and the things themselves that were depicted. He knew that no matter the intensity with which one gazed at the page of text describing some real or imagined occurrence, the assembly of ink symbols and intervening blank paper fibers on the page would never be the same as the meaning that the ink symbols and intervening blank paper fibers had been arranged to convey. You could watch a leaf fall to the ground, for example, and then draw a picture of your recollection of the event, but you could not then watch the drawn leaf fall to the ground, no matter how intently you gazed at it. Skillful artists could convey the sense of abstract or immaterial natural phenomena, such as an autumn breeze, that then invoked in the subconsciousness of the viewer a sense of before and after, and thus a dynamic illusion of one moment following consecutively after another, even when it was plain to see that all there was was ink and paper. One allowed oneself to be drawn in and immersed in the illusion Skillful observers of skillful artwork should then have no trouble, reasoned Chichikov, reverse engineering the process, by which the skillfully conveyed but false impression of movement and time passing could be neutralized, revealing the true nature of ink and paper beneath the scene. Chichikov knew that “skillful artwork” was, in the limit, Creation itself; and that it must follow that the “skillful artist”, in the limit, was the Creator, Christ Pantocrator, seated at the top of the sky, or rather at the top of the skies so skillfully depicted at the tops of Byzantine cathedral domes. It only remained, then, to take the limit of the “skillful observer of skillful artwork”, and one would arrive at the observer capable of recognizing the unmoving, timeless medium beneath the Illusion of Artful Movement…the poignant
Say you were standing before a painting of some autumn scene in some illustrious museum where such works are kept, for example, thought Chichikov, going over in his mind how he would convince whoever came for him to look out his window and understand that the autumn leaves were not in fact falling from their branches, that, in fact, nothing at all was happening; that is to say, that time had stopped. The abstract feeling of an autumn breeze is skillfully conveyed in this painting you are hypothetically looking at in the museum, he went on to himself, by which you get a sense of autumn leaves shaking loose from their boughs and sailing to the ground. And yet nowhere you looked, in any direction, are there in fact any real leaves falling to the ground. You feel no breeze, hear no rustling of leaves. In fact, it is plainly evident that there is is paint and the canvas on which the scene is painted. But you have a good look, and are drawn in by the mimesis. Who is to say you yourself are not some concoction of fabrics and pigments? You looked up again at the leaves fluttering on their branches, and struggled to see one come loose and sail to the ground on the light autumn breeze, but again and again they just remained there, fluttering on their branches; and then when he looked and saw that a leaf had come loose and was sailing to the ground, it had already come loose from its branch before his gaze alighted upon it. You could tell by the way that the branches were that a tree was present.  You could tell by the way the leaves curled over on themselves that a breeze was present; and yet none of the leaves finished sailing to the ground. Was it that none of it at all was there?  If you could just remain unaware of what it all was, then things continued on normally, but as soon as you tried to know what it was, and to see the leaf, the leaves froze where they were, and did not finish their descent; and the mist further on, and the layers of magenta light weighed on the landscape like heavy sacks.  The world became dead, hard, difficult to figure out. The moment froze and did not carry on to the next moment. But you are philosophically inclined, you know what terms like “prima facie” mean and “want to get at the essence” of everything. You reach out to touch the breeze, setting off alarms in the museum. You feel that it is dry and brittle and threatens to come apart in your hands, because it is, in fact, the mere fabric on which the scene was painted. And, in that last moment before being apprehended by museum gendarmes, you might even hear something that sounds like the whisper of breeze through autumn boughs, but it is only the whisper of old canvas between your fingertips. And yet when you had a good look, you could not deny the landscapes of copse and mansions on hills in the distance, with some goats further on, randomly congregated groups of hounds sitting in the rain, baying their little hearts out for no discernible reason. Or rather, what you could not deny was your appetite to see and be deceived into seeing these things.
[Like this, Chichikov went over what he would say to whoever came for him.] Again and again, we allowed ourselves to fall for reality’s artful depictions, and the brittle parchment of space and time disintegrated between our fingertips. Again and again, reality failed to be real. A little further on there was another valley hidden beneath a thick mist.  Like this you inferred the presence; there was no way of telling it was there, but it was because of this that you could infer its presence.  It was completely evident that what you had were maple trees, gingko trees, plum trees, and willow trees.  If you just had a look and saw the old crooked branches, and the knotted shales of bark, you knew immediately without a doubt what it was, and you could go back to it again and again and know the reality.  But here was the problem; as soon as you went back and knew what the reality was, the leaves froze where they were and did not sail the rest of the way to the ground.  The trees were still.  There was no whisper through any of the branches of any breeze.  The vermillion layers in the distance staled and weighed on the horizon. You could infer, derive, deduce, draw conclusions about the reality of what was taking place before your eyes, in the same way that you inferred the presence of the breeze, coming closer and closer to the conclusion that none of it was there, that it had never been there.  It was there, certainly, causing you the problem, but it was an absence, a negativity.  Absence, negativity, and emptiness were all there too, Chichikov knew.  Perhaps they were the only things that were truly present.  This was the sort of conclusion your laws and formulations were always headed towards, and then you came up with some new laws to try to avoid that destination.
You could not say, as the museum gendarmes dragged you off, that the leaves had continued to fall to the ground all this time, implying a point in the past, before the leaves had continued, and a point in the future after the point of continuation. You could not say that there was an autumn breeze or that there was a forest outside your window. All there was was parchment, ink, chemical pigments. Likewise, Chichikov knew, you could not say that you were in a museum viewing a painting of an autumn scene or that gendarmes were dragging you off, because these were themselves just words written on a different kind of parchment, no less brittle, emitting a susurrus as the fondling of cognition.. But you had to concentrate hard, for at the same time none of these things were really there. All there was was ink formed into different symbols on paper, ostensibly random, by turns, ostensibly ordered according to hidden, phased lattices of ciphers, by turns, phased arrays of strategic target umbrellas.

On the one hand there is an imperative to answer the question “what happened to me?”  On the other hand, there is an imperative to self-preservation, to protect the general syntactical operating coherence on which the mind is premised.
Because the contents cannot be countenanced within the general system of conscious activity, Traumatic contents can bear such an intense emotional charge that their presence in the general system of conscious activity impairs the lower functionality.  Because they cannot be countenanced, the mind, in what is essentially an act of self-defense, will take measures to mask their significance.  The question of “what happened” cannot be answered, because the answer would destroy the general syntactical coherence.  The act of recognizing the contents for what they are, of comprehending the narrative of events which have placed you in your current state of cognitive disorder, would undermine the lower functionality.  And so what happens Chichikov is that the mind, in what is essentially an act of self-defense, takes whatever measures are at its disposal to render the traumatic contents unrecogniziable.
The question of why the mind doesn’t simply shut down and die under such pressures remains a hotly debated mystery. But most researchers agree that the mind is an entropy reducing machine. It is teleologically driven to organize and make sense of the world, to order disordered contents. …
Direct recognition of the traumatic contents would destroy the mind, and yet these contents cannot be erased from the mind, and so the mind is faced with two paradoxical imperatives. It must reduce entropy and yet also expel the pathogen. But the contents cannot be expelled like some pathogen, it is not composed of cells but of illusions built upon other illusions. what happens is that the mind forges self-preserving subconscious mechanisms to suspend the contents from the general system of conscious activity. What ensues is a sort of masque whereby the subconscious mechanisms continuously demolish and recombine the traumatic contents into forms which partly reveal but partly distort or submerge the reality.  of cognitive frames, memory shards, half submerged faces. What ensues [reflective symmetry later on: The dead did not, merely by virtue of their being dead, vanish.  And what the military hardware did was suspend the living into an abstract, nebulous realm, a sort of masque of cognitive frames that sliced up the living into small pieces that were then scattered across the subconscious regions of the sierra…]  And what happens in cases such as yours, Chichikov, is that the mind permutes   but rather must render them as unrecognizable as possible.  The mind will subconsciously churn through the different possible permutations of arrangements of sharded memories. On the one hand, the mind must reject this task, in the interest of its own self-preservation; while on the other hand, the mind is teleologically driven to resolve the question, and gradually draws more and more of the brain’s cognitive resources into the melee.  And what happens, Chichikov, is that the mind will superimpose onto the immediately surrounding environment of sensuously manifest, cognitive surface features, these cycles of permutations, almost as a game.  And each of the permutations is vaguely accurate, but fails to hit the mark.  Giving you a distorted version.
The message is buried in the syntax.  The message is syntax.  It is not that the message is replaced by the cognitive delivery structure.  Rather what I mean to say is that the message becomes so enveloped in the syntactical self-similarity that any distinction between the message and the carrier structure becomes meaningless.
Content is itself a formal way of rendering unfamiliar forms, of parsing through symbols and archetypes which seem to resonate. You’ll never get down to a final layer which can be identified as the source, the bedrock of meaning.  Alan Turing proved this.
And what you’ll find, Chichikov,  is that your mind will parse through the different possible permutations of arrangements of shards, but without ever getting down to a final layer of meaning which you can call real or authentic.  Children are taught in school that the content of a cyphertext is the message.  But you have figured out by now that a message is its own cyphertext—another syntactical structure called English or Russian or Farsi meant to be parsed by consciousness.  There is no reason, then, to call the message deciphered by consciousness the final meaning or the core meaning hidden within the cypher.  What you might call the “core meaning,” then, is itself another syntactical structure, a cognitive delivery system.  Ciphers do not encode messages; they encode other cyphers.  Languages do not convey meaning, but rather other languages.  Languages are not surface realizations of “deep structure,” but of other languages. It is completely arbitrary what level of encryption you choose to call the “message” hidden within the cipher. If there is something at all meaningful about a language, it is its fractal dimension—the measure of how much a language fails to fill the cognitive space. This is what Godel realized in his unpublished notebooks.
The suppressed contents, merely by their being suppressed, do not disappear.
And what happens, Chichikov, is that the mind will suspend the traumatic contents, but the traumatic contents, merely by their being repressed, do not go away.  Because they are unbearable to behold, the mind subconsciously disconfigures them into an unrecognizable form.  The picture of “what happened” is shattered into fragments which are then scattered throughout the subconscious regions of the brain.  However, the information is not thereby deleted, and can be reconstituted from the shards.  The mind continues to try to piece the puzzle together.
The mind will superimpose the suppressed contents onto the surrounding environment.
[reflective symmetery with the dead:]
Chichikov knew that the dead, merely by their being dead, did not vanish altogether.  The dead left a mark—the little divot of air marking their having once been alive—and that this was very different from people who didn’t exist.
Chichikov knew that the dead, merely by their being dead, did not vanish altogether.  The dead left a sort of divot in the aether no longer occupied by their souls—the mark of their having once been alive. This was very different from people who didn’t exist.  This was the much overlooked but critical difference between death and non-existence.  People who were dead had the property of having once been alive.  It was thus possible for other people who were still in the state of being of alive to know of their having existed, and to know of how they passed from the state of being alive to the state of being dead.  The very state of being alive called into existence the binary state space of alive/dead. … However, the hardware could only suspend the living from their lives, at which point they became dead; the hardware could shatter the living into a thousand pieces, and then scatter these pieces across the mountains, forests, rivers, and oceans, but it could not erase the fact that the scattered remains had once composed living bodies.



Chichikov switched parse-axes6:th.p/switch invertor field omittors to invertor indicted div.select-7htt./6phis ommitor\\:[escape]dial-abstractd frame.
Chichikov: “What was your styler s4et to?”
Chichikov: What year is it, Hank?
Chichikov toggled the, putting himself squarely within Hank’s bandwidth.
Hank: But you’re making excellent progress, Chichikov!, and I want you to be proud of that.  Now you’re still struggling, I know, to frame things in their proper context; and it’s tough—ward psychiatrists call this phase the most difficult phase of convalescence.  I’ve decided to reactivate visiting rights on your file again, and to start up your class section again.  But you’re doing an excellent job, Chichikov, making terrific progress, and I think it will be time to start up your class section again.
And then they had a little laugh over the joke.
Chichikov: Where are we?
	Hank: At a restaurant on the waterfront, in Georgetown.
Chichikov: And the names?

Andrei looked up at the sky from under his brow, letting his labor wane a little, and giving his eyes to peek out a little from under the shadow of his brow-line; he felt his eyes emerging from the shadow into the light a little.  He thought, “No, a peacock could not elbow past this banner.”  The contour of his skull where it formed around his eyes lent a darkness to the overall impression of his countenance which people Andrei met in general never put their finger on.  Now, like the thin stem of a flower which rises from the bulb in the soil, Andrei tilted his face at the sky, like the saints in the paintings, when the white dove descends into Mary’s womb, and the saints are gathered around, their heads tilted a little at what is going on in the sky, what is the commotion with the goldenrod in the sky and the dove.  He heard the ch’ih-chaung of the cash register and saw the thin stem of the flower rising heavenward.  Just as the stem which sprouts forth from the bulb beneath the soil, and not some sum or calculation as if made by machine.  Just so, Andrei felt his vision rising to Heaven.
	Then how was it his vision rose to Heaven?  If nothing but what did not evaporate in the face of reason held primacy then what was his vision doing, rising up to Heaven?  He tilted his face at the sky in a pious air, trying to look up after his vision.  Where it was floating off to, and the commotion it made in the sky.  Was it only that he was looking up?  No, he saw his vision clearly floating up through the sky like a rose stem which climbs up from the bulb, sprouting first leaves.  He knew his eyeballs were the bulbs of his vision.  When his vision had sprouted a little ways up, then little leaves would spread, which were like wings which climbed the air.  Leaves, and any sort of life, really, were just the wings which pulled through the ether.  What body the wings belonged to, i.e. life proper which finds itself dragged through the ether, was by turns life’s great question and life’s great answer.  As for what was the “ether” or what kind of feathers and such, these were just words.
	His vision pulled through, infinitely incalculable.  The cash register gave a little ch’au-chang, and what rose Heavenward, what sum, or price, but the stem of a flower!		Andrei knew what he was thinking about now.  He was remembering how he heard all of the Pianos begin to play as he walked down the street to his mother’s house.  Not to say he was not remembering his past too.  But this other remembrance—the remembrance of the Pianos—turned out to have worn his past as a masque just then; thereby to communicate itself to him.  As a rule Andrei never pretended.  His recounting his past was just the secret language by which the minuter remembrance of the Pianos could communicate itself to him just then.  He tried to picture his thoughts in his head to figure out how they pulled off such stunts as this one.  The trunk of a tree began taking shape before him (in his mind).  One half was pink, demarcating one thought, and one half was blue, demarcating the other thought.  No, that model would not do.  His thoughts of his past and his remembrance of the Pianos were of different woods, perhaps of different elements.  The former encompassed all Andrei’s life.  The latter only a half-hour or so.  The latter was only a remembrance, while the former was his past.  Yet this mere remembrance had suffused all his past, used all of its moments to communicate itself!  Had it been so grandiose, the sight of all the Pianos?  Andrei tried hard to remember now:  He had been walking through the capital, peeking over the window sills at all the Pianos in the houses where probably the aristocrats lived.  Then he had heard it.  The Pianos had begun their playing all at once.  He had begun his jumping again, his peeking over the window sills to see what the people looked like playing the pianos but no one was seated at any of the Pianos.  The Pianos were playing by themselves.
It did not make sense that the piano played all by itself with no one at the keys and without it being a player piano—but that was the point of it.  And then it doubly did not make sense that the point of it was that it was a piano that played by itself without any special mechanical device or without a ghost that actually played the piano.  “This is Pianism,” thought Andrei, “this is my movement.—And I am its first martyr!”
He knew that it did not make sense—there were better metaphors to be sure, Kafka’s Castle, Beckett’s Mallone (I’ll go on.  I won’t go on), the Thirty-sixth case of the Mumonkan, for example (A Man of Tao along the Way)—all of the great thinkers who had come before him had already captured it and expressed it in the best way possible, he knew, and that they would say that it did not make sense that the point behind the Piano was that it played by itself—and not because of the aid of some special mechanical device or not because a ghost was playing the piano—the piano was a normal piano, but it played without anyone touching the keys.  Nor was there a ghost present.
“Why did it play all by itself?” they would belabor him with their interrogations, “Very well, you say there’s no mechanism behind it, nothing to be grasped and put into discourse.  But what benefit is to be gained?”
“The benefit, dear sir,” said Andrei on that occasion, “is your very consternation and questioning—that is the whole point!”
	“Ah!”


2

Huddled ever closer to the ivory slats of the piano—the sign of the cross—dropping them, picking them up again—knowing what he had to do with them, after the most blackguardly manner—labor and capital—quasi-born thing—work is love—knew the games—sensuously manifested putrefaction—the smile as broad as the horizon—the sickening din of steel-coated lathis against unprotected skulls.  There would not be a book that would not be a manifesto.  There would not be a word that would not be a doctrine.  It was not possible to say a word that was not a manifesto.  Not that he had decided it.  You were born into a world, did certain things, were of a certain ilk, thought Andrei.  Well, the world registered it in certain ways, was all he could see.  You did not decide to be of one ilk or another.  You were just a certain way that you had not done, and then the people said “you were that way,” even though it had not been so.  Then this fact, of which no one was guilty, made a certain mark upon the world.  Later on you had the illusion of having done something.
	They were at dinner.  One of the gentlemen seated at the table was asking him why one of the chapters bore a title.  It did not make sense.  All of the other chapters were numbered, then came chapter two which was called A First Martyr of the Pianist Movement.  Why?  Were you about pianos or orchestras?  Did he want to be a writer when he grew up?  He huddled close to the ivory slats.  He had to fasten the ivory slats to the keys of the piano.  His hands trembled; the slats fell from his hand and he had to pick them up again.
	And now they charged him with aloofness, pomposity, condescension.  Yes, they, the dinner guests, the inventors of the loamy depth.  “All in all,” they said, and: “when it comes right down to it.”
You got to the point where you could no longer be alive unless you were dead.  how it was serious at first but then turned out not to be serious.  The one of how it would seem to be a serious thing at first but then turned out to be a joke, the true genius of it.  You could be serious if you were Samuel Beckett, for example, or Maya Angelou.  But then after that it was not possible to be serious.  Andrei had been born after the end of seriousness.  And now you could no longer be serious if it did not turn out later that you had only been joking when it seemed that you were serious.  There were the different ways to say it, the different funny things.  The only one way to see it the life of blustery.  A long, overwrought structure.  The different ways to mean it.  Some of them meant it in a way you didn’t catch at first.  Then some of them meant it in a different way and they got rich.  You were by turns obscure, by turns rich.  O great wisdom!  By turns died obscure and poor, by turns were rich and acclaimed, and O great wisdom of the literary movement great idol.  You alternately rotted away unfit for life and were not even discovered by posterity, alternately held the token of power and fame and were thus ignorant and conceited and were despised when the light of posterity shone on your ignorance and conceit; and thus unfit for life.  You had this way, O great scholarly wisdom,” thought Andrei, in praise of “meeting yourself around back.  Of the extremes meeting and becoming one great universal cycle.  There was that one problem of the conceit of youth, that problem of being able to say such awful, tasteless things without even knowing it.  The long, overwrought artifice stretched out before you, an unworkable quay used by ancestors; it made you vulnerable to the great error of not writing a good novel.  Of finding no way to give an aesthetic sense to your life.  You could end up saying for example, “We are like Dido and Aeneas.”  You could make that error, and then no one would like you.
You looked back even now in the baleful youth of twenty years, even now looked back with wat’ry-eyed hindsight of forty years, to condemn, with even-eyed sobriety pouring out upon the page, the jerky phrase:

No, I cannot countenance it.

Uncommunicative, they had said.  But he had wanted nothing more than to communicate his fellow man.  But there could be no greater disservice to a man than to talk to him in his own language.  For that was patronage.  ‘Twas condescension and aloofness.  No!  Down with windy bourgeois sentiment!  Down with Chummy meta-language!  The aim of literature was to forge a public of actual dignity.  Of the old kind we have had enough—more than enough!  Will you preach to the old kind of public—the stranglers and emasculators of the present age?  All they are interested in is hearing tales about how their outrageous crimes are just.  Should you whisper something else, should you not help them along to the precipice—toward which they are limping with all their might!—they will insult you, viz. they will call you pompous and condescending, insensitive, aloof.  No, with them there is nothing more to talk about.  The whole point of the new literature is that it does not waste its time there, must direct its voice to the new man and the new woman, must be a salutation to the new public, those who will defend the future from the stranglers of the present age—to real dignity, conscious of itself, and not the mimetic, old semblances.
Communicate with a man, thought Andrei, clutching the ivory slats to his chest, dropping them, picking them up again, cutting himself against the flat edges, reach out to a man, win a man’s trust—only to help him along to the edge of the precipice toward which he already mightily limps!, only to insert him further into his shit-world of conceit and self-deception, to assuage his fears that he will go to hell, that his crimes are forgiveable (and thereby sell a book)—no!  That could not be communication.  And—would it not be better to break the legs of such a public, so they will limp no more?
They were asking him what he meant at the dinner table.  Fate: even if you were to The crux of it lay in this: Fate.  Even if you were to leave off in the middle somewhere the notes would still conduce one to the end; so that if one were to do it correctly it would lead to that inevitable end.  Once the basso continuo began playing the descent into the grave it would not stop; it would repeat all the times necessary (37) until Dido’s steps took her into the grave.  If one were to decide to do it correctly.  So that even in the event that the orchestra should stop playing—and why should it?  Life does not stop playing without the orchestra—and one were to say, “No, I shall leave off here.  I do not like where this is headed.”  And you set off down your path of private inquiry, dedicating whole sections of your life to research and introspection; even then the notes upon the page would not be altered and would still lead to the end, so that all your years of learning and introspection could not but lead you, by the very fruit of your learning and introspection, right back to the moment of rejection of the truth at the core of existence: the piano notes lead to the end.  And not in a different way but in just the way,
The astutest at the dinner table made the following remark: “There is a certain grotesquerie, a motif pathetique or enfant that you are belaboring and trying to make new.  But there is not the triumph of Joyce’s Daedalus.”
That kind of triumph is only a provisional triumph.  It was a noble attempt and Andrei smiled.  It was different from what others said.  But you were not able to define it no matter what you said.  Even had you said the most outrageous things it would still not be defined.  “That is what the world does not, and may never, understand about the Pianist Movement,” thought Andrei later on when he went over it in his mind.  Take any work of art and its corresponding body of scholarship.  Take a literary work, for example, or a painting: The objective of scholarship has been to induct the artwork or art-emotion into the framework of familiar thought.  But scholarship, thought Andrei, if it is to exist, must be oriented in the opposite direction.
“No!  If it is really to be of any use to humanity, then scholarship must push the art-object out further into ever more unfamiliar regions of consciousness, so that we are drawn out further with it.  Improved access to the artwork—or, more properly, to the truth it points to—is a good thing; but we must not deign to bring it closer to us, but rather be made to go out to it.  Any work of art that we can hold in the palm of our hand has failed as an artwork.  This was what I had understood by a ‘literary movement,’” Andrei had told the dinner guests seated at the table with him that night.  “The problem with that, you will object,” Andrei had said, “is that the Pianist Movement is of no use to those who are left behind.  Those who are drawn out to the artwork will presumably encounter a new reality which they will be unable to transmit to those of us who have stayed behind.
“In which group would you rather be?” asked Andrei then rhetorically.  Fine then, he had made his point.  There was neither coherence nor incoherence nor both coherence and incoherence nor neither coherence nor incoherence.  All levels of understanding were levels of delusion.  Both delusion and understanding were approximations of the truth and as such at least one step away from it.  It was important to be in the group that went out and perished and did not come back, Andrei knew, because that was the group that had reached the truth, just as the moth had reached the flame.
For that reason they fell silent, found no use for theories and could no longer distinguish between a good carreer move and a bad one.  Andrei himself, Andrei knew, was on the verge of being drawn “too far out” and immolating himself in the moth flame, hence the dilated parameters.  The parameters were:  the fate was: he dreamt once:
After the point of not coming back there would be nothing, not even a blank page.  However, he had still not been consumed in his sorrows and travails, and that was why you still caught glimpses of what it was.  You caught certain dilated or distorted glimpses but it was not true.



Now their number was called and the two gentlemen stood up from their umbrella table and ambled across the creaking pier boards in the direction of the waiter’s signal frequency.  Here you are, said the grinning black-vested waiter, opening his palm voraciously in the direction they must follow.  Chichikov was stricken and they continued on into the elevator, Hank and Chichikov, and descended beneath the pier they sank cozily into shiny next-form suits which were already half-submerged in the bay.  They closed their face shields and sank cozily beneath the water.  Chichikov could hear the oxygen vents beginning to whir behind his neck.  Lofty Cha’an strain-tones drew them deeper towards the dining room.  The other diners began to come into view.  Intermittent forms of grey and white and green sprawling pitifully in the murk of algae.  Chichikov and Hank rotated 45º sweep along their vertical axes, bringing their oblique stomachs to rest against the slanted bank of algae.  Jets of ozone shot from their fontanels, indicating the successful engagement of the dining apparatuses.
Chichikov said: What I would like, Hank, are the names of those who are still alive, but who have died with respect to legal form.  Your dead souls.
Hank: What happens, Chichikov, is that the mind creates a masque or dementia to cover over the suppressed contents, distorting them, and distorting everything that surrounds them, everything that bears the slightest connection to them.  Distorting reality.  The mind not only projects a fictitious event in place of the actual experiences sustained, but projects the whole fictitious background to that fictitious event.  The psychosis projects not only the distorted object, but the distorted world in which it takes place.  The object and field of objectification are the same.  What is called the truth is the composite of these two. / The mind projects a fictitious artifice onto the reality of the experiences sustained—the object of trauma—but it also projects the whole background, the whole field in which it is objectified.  It is the nature of the mind to objectify not only the object, but objectification and the field of objectification.  In the falsification, the making a fiction out of, the object, the field of objectification is also rendered a distorted reflection of itself, and objectification itself is also falsified and made a fiction of: that is, the mode of cognition which produces this falsification is rendered identical to that of the novel.  By projecting the distorted object, the psychosis projects the distorted world.  The obfuscation of the truth content is the projection of the obfuscated truth content and the obfuscated universe of cognition, and hence obfuscated obfuscation, and the distorted distortion.  The whole mind organizes itself around the suppression of the truth content, becoming a function of the suppression, which becomes the central formative activity of consciousness.  But what happens is that when the suppressed content of the past bears an especially powerful psychical charge, the effort required to continue suppression is unsustainable; it threatens to annihilate the whole mind—But this is the problem which we began with: nothing can be annihilated.  It is the illusory aim of suppression to annihilate the suppressed contents.  But it is an illusory aim.  It is impossible to annihilate anything.  What happens is that eventually the suppressed truth content emerges again.  The masque of dementia begins to disintegrate in places, and the truth of the past emerges through the disintegration.
Hank: New Wye all Panoptic Range, ward 7, Arlington veteran’s clinic0010are in Ward 7.
Hank: Ah there.  I’m sorry Chichikov, I h dn’t connected the field-handle (om t .: range7).  We’re giving you the 23Ghz-3dTzts range, but we need to know at all times what frequency you r  on.” n s ch c ses   c nf o t ti   wi h the  n e ra le  o tents is therefore un  oidable.  An  what the m n  do s th n is it develop  a ki d of masq e  to blanket over thei  unbea  ble effect—to provide some way to con  on  t em  n ir ctl , ob iqu ly.  The re lit  o  th  p st  s  he  m di te  b  a de en ia   hi h  l o  e I te   h   ea I y of t e p es n .     e l s r n l   h t  u I g t e G lf W r you un erw nt a traumatic comba   x  r en e  t t e ba t e o    llu ah wh  h   I ge e   h  p yc o is Our primary task is to find out what happened. 001901vvtr::Hank said, “All of these disparate threads weave together into a single, coherent story.  What we must do is find out what that story is, what happened.” “I haven’t been able to find anything Chichikov on Nam Pha or on any coastal village which was outside the bombing corridors; and I’m checking the intelligence maps.  (The customs house on Hill 47b.  I didn’t understand before, Chichikov, when you said about Bazarov.  I’d like you to talk more about that.”)
(Hank said, “I haven’t been able to find anything Chichikov on Nam Pha or on any coastal village which was outside the bombing corridors; and I’m checking the intelligence maps now, nor anything about any female VC commander….One Thuy Vai Liet.)
—————e491:001:01:00————
124. Without prejudice to the fact that the active subjects are the intellectual and material authors of the crimes…the State is also responsible, because the majority of these acts were the product of a policy pre-established by a command superior to the material perpetrators. 
It is a universally accepted premise that the individual is the subject of any criminal situation, since humans alone possess will and can therefore take decisions based on will: it is individuals that commit crimes, not the institutions they have created.  As a result, it is to individuals and not their institutions that the corresponding penalties established by law must be applied. 

—————e491:001:01:00————
Our primary task is to find out what happened.
—————e491:001:01:02————
1) Launch an attack with US based ICBMs to destroy the MRBM and medium bomber bases.
2) Same as one, but use Polaris missiles.
3) Same as one, but use theater fighter bombers.
4) Same as one, but use theater MRBM forces (if available).
5) Send an ultimatum that unless the Soviets stopeed using these systems the US would destroy a limited number of military targets in the Soviet Union.
6) Not respond, but permit continuation of the Soviet sanctuary.
—————e491:001:01:04————
Hank: “It is common in cases such as yours, Chichikov, that the latent
narrative of dementia, even as it fades away, becomes much more explicit and even aggressive.  But eventually the psychosis plants the seeds of its own undoing, you’ll find, generating progressively greater fluctuations which contradict the internal logic of the psychosis.  The internal logic of dementia always leads itself naturally into greater and 
—————e491:001:01:07————
greater contradictions of itself, until at last the masque deteriorates, and the truth emerges.  But the psychosis, you’ll find, plants the seeds of its own cure, causing fluctuations which increasingly contradict the internal logic.
But now you have turned the corner on this Chichikov.  You have made excellent progress.  I want you to continue coming to the workshops.  How’s the crab?
—————e491:001:01:09————
Chichikov: Heh, heh, well!   I’m just glad we’re on the same page again, heh-heh!
Hank: Ha-ha!
Hank: Chichikov, switch axes6:th.p/switch invertor field omittors.
Chichikov: “What was your styler s4et to?”
Hank (on 6vettr.:) said: There will be residual complications to be sure, but you have made good progress, Chichikov.  I think it’s all right for you to receive visitors again.  Apparently, you thought you were in a Russian novel of some sort, and you would subjectively interpret the objective reality of our sessions in the office within the false framework of the novel, but you are emerging from the dementia.  And I think it will be time to start your classes again soon.  Hey, I’m just sorry it has taken us so long o see eye to eye.
Chichikov: What year is it, Hank?
What’s News—
The signal was clear, and the channels of this range were zero-faulting.hp.tr//(non-connect):New Wye Panopticon 1997 GE (USOFAC) Int., Inc. Chichikov:::bac d away arc d seven di s sevren cascka; tor0uud si/http:cke  him who’ll time and space were the same.  0091:htz//l-ohmHe knew distance and space vanished and met at the edge of the frame.  Constraiants7n-1, +1: bile.  at the edge of vision arcing clearly through the hydrogen ether and Hank understood.  Had he misunderstood the cipher?
Chichikov: I think what happened was021010119//lttp.l0:after):/
:/Reality is the same as itself and not different.  It was only natural at first, after all, that the thing or web of events seemed different than when you looked at it from what it was.  But when you looked at it you saw thatChichikov toggled the invertor indicted driver-7htt./6phis ommitor dial-abstracted frame, putting himself squarely within Hank’s bandwidth.The signal was clear, and the channels of this range zero-faulting.hp.tr//(non-connect): Chichikov: I’m just happy, Dr. Hank, that th4re is no connection between the pain and the cause of the pain.
Hank: What year is it, Chichikov?  Who is the President?
Chichikov toggled the invertor indicted driver-7htt./6phis ommitor dial-abstracted [clear, and the channels of this range zero-faulting.hp.tr//(non-connect):] frame, putting himself squarely within Hank’s bandwidth.
The signal was clear, and the channels of this range zero-invertoring.hp.tr//(non-connect):
“But the constant imagined reversal of the experience, the suppression of reality—both of past and present—and the uncontrovertible fact that you did experience these unbearable things, amounts also to a distortion of the reality of the present.  If you do not have the courage to countenance the reality of the past is impossible to countenance, so is the reality of the present.  It was the universally accepted premise that there were no connections of causality between the atrocities carried out by the state and the stateforces, as Pain did not bear a relation between itself and a putative “cause of pain.”  It could not be traced back to a source of the pain, but bore only relation to itself as its sole proine reality.  Otherwise the pain—which can only be said to exist in a provisional, putative sense—does not exist.  In the instant that the “suffering,” the “massacres,” are “traced back” to a given set of “origins,” “a given set of perpetrators,” and so forth, “state apparatuses,” “G2,”  etc. “the United States of America,” for example, and so on, They cease to exist—because in the instant that the atrocities are traced back to their real causes, the premise of their existence is erased.  Suffering and inequality could only be traced back to itself, and to nothing else but itself, again and again, and again.
Please, Chichikov, just call me Hank.
Chichikov said: I’m just happy to you and grateful, Dr. Hank that the painb does not exist.
Chichikov: I’m just happy Dr. Hank that Washington010010010101001000//ttp.
them.00It is on the basis of this00 p isi nal character that we are able to cons  uct such bold ironies, conveying meanings tha  are exactly the opposite of those we articulate and express.  Some even rat e  bold ironies can be construc ed in th s manner, by which we c nv y e actly th  opp sit  of  ha  w 01009910091000000000000 009100000001 99000 00000000000900000000090919999999999010 Hank (on 6vettr.:) came online: I’m sorry it took us so long to see eye to eye on this. Chichikov said:0001000000100000 00000010000001000000000100000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000000001000000000000000010000000ht/:Hank: “It is common in cases such as yours, Chichikov, that the latent narrative of dementia, even as it fades away, becomes much more explicit and even aggressive.  But not to worry—excellent negative gate0/6ively greater fluctuations which contradict the internal logic of the psychosis.  The 000101t:hs//negative gate: internal logic of dementia leads itself naturally into greater and greater contradictions of itself, until at last the masque deteriorates, and the truth emerges.  But the psychosis, you’ll find, plants the seeds of its own cure, causing fluctuations which increasingly contradict the internal logic.000_gate:
000000000000000000000000000000 Hank: You’re making good progress, Chichikov.  I’ve decided to reactivate visiting rights for your file.  In fact, I’ve even called up your cousin Mike.  You remember Mike, your cousin?
82. The Clarification Commission found the State responsible for 93% of the registered human rights violations, indicating a persistent and systematized campaign of abuses, with peaked intensity during the six year period, when 91% of the violations occurred.  Whether acting alone or in concert with other forces, the Army was found responsible for 85% of all human rights violations and violence registered by the committee.  And the “Civil Defense Patrols,” created by the Army, were found guilty of the remaining 18%. 
Chichikov 9Elia-/…fField jam sevenedit, picking up interference on both indicted-ommitor frames.
Hank: Chichikov, switch axes6:th.p/switch invertor field omittors.
Chichikov: “What was your styler s4et to?”
Chichikov: Background Radiation- Normal DEW Radar (Kotzebue): 66.53 N Lat. x 162.67 W Long.; TargetHardness- 10 psi; Background Radiation- Normal DEW Radar (Point Barrow): 70.71 N Lat. x 156.28 W Long.; Target Hardness- 10 psi; Background Radiation- Normal DEW Station No. 25: 67.50 N Lat. x 138.78 W Long.; Target Hardness- 10 psi; Background Radiation- Normal PAVE PAWS (Robins AFB): 32.37 N Lat. x 83.64 W“We are revoking your library privileges for the time being Chichikov until you return the books that you have borrowed.” / “It will be outside the B-52 corridors, in a hiÇen, village...begins with an ‘N’” / 	“I’ve lÖked on the intelligence maps, Chichikov...” / “No, it will not be on the intelligence maps 011 0100000000 0011111111111901011111 111v 1 1110000 00000000000000000111111111001010100000000000000000000000110101111111000000000001111111111101111111000000000000000000000000111111111011111111100000010100000000000011010100011101110101010101001010101100101110010011000000000000000101111111000011
Hank: All this can be verified, Chichikov, by cross-checking our names against the names of those who were entered into the register
86. Through massacres and scorched earth operations planned by the State, the Army completely exterminated entire civilian communities, destroying households, earnings, crops and other means of bare survival.  626 such massacres were registered… 
Now their number was called and the two gentlemen stood up from their umbrella table and ambled across the creaking pier boards in the direction of the waiter’s signal frequency.  Here you are, said the grinning black-vested waiter, opening his palm voraciously in the direction they must follow.  Chichikov was stricken and they continued on into the elevator, Hank and Chichikov, and descended beneath the pier they sank cozily into shiny next-form suits which were already half-submerged in the bay.  They closed their face shields and sank cozily beneath the water.  Chichikov could hear the oxygen vents beginning to whir behind his neck.  Lofty Cha’an strain-tones drew them deeper towards the dining room.  The other diners began to come into view.  Intermittent forms of grey and white and green sprawling pitifully in the murk of algae.  Chichikov and Hank rotated 45º sweep along their vertical axes, bringing their oblique stomachs to rest against the slanted bank of algae.  Jets of ozone shot from their fontanels, indicating the successful engagement of the dining apparatuses.
Hank asked once more for the names of the dead.
Hank: What happens, Chichikov, is that the mind creates a masque or dementia to cover over the suppressed contents, distorting them, and distorting everything that surrounds them, everything that bears the slightest connection to them.  Distorting reality.  The mind not only projects a fictitious event in place of the actual experiences sustained, but projects the whole fictitious background to that fictitious event.  The psychosis projects not only the distorted object, but the distorted world in which it takes place.  The object and field of objectification are the same.  What is called the truth is the composite of these two. / The mind projects a fictitious artifice onto the reality of the experiences sustained—the object of trauma—but it also projects the whole background, the whole field in which it is objectified.  It is the nature of the mind to objectify not only the object, but objectification and the field of objectification.  In the falsification, the making a fiction out of, the object, the field of objectification is also rendered a distorted reflection of itself, and objectification itself is also falsified and made a fiction of: that is, the mode of cognition which produces this falsification is rendered identical to that of the novel.  By projecting the distorted object, the psychosis projects the distorted world.  The obfuscation of the truth content is the projection of the obfuscated truth content and the obfuscated universe of cognition, and hence obfuscated obfuscation, and the distorted distortion.  The whole mind organizes itself around the suppression of the truth content, becoming a function of the suppression, which becomes the central formative activity of consciousness.  But what happens is that when the suppressed content of the past bears an especially powerful psychical charge, the effort required to continue suppression is unsustainable; it threatens to annihilate the whole mind—But this is the problem which we began with: nothing can be annihilated.  It is the illusory aim of suppression to annihilate the suppressed contents.  But it is an illusory aim.  It is impossible to annihilate anything.  What happens is that eventually the suppressed truth content emerges again.  The masque of dementia begins to disintegrate in places, and the truth of the past emerges through the disintegration.




Hank: Ted and Linda are here to take you out to lunch, Chichikov, isn’t that swell?
What happened was, Bruce Willis was running down the street shooting, and…what happens Chichikov, is that Meg Ryan …
The little data shitstorm of chummy, bourgeois colloquialisms, chock-a-block with pop refs.
Hey bro	how ya been	all set?	Been a while
Long time no see!	I thought we’d go to Red Lobster	The aliens are about to blow up the white house	
Aw, so sweet!	Did you see the new Bruce Willis movie?		
www.disney.com			
		regional vice-manager	
How’s that lobster		They sneak the nuke into Wrigley Field	
		Remember Ted?	Sound all right?
	it was kick ass		

So, / So, seen any good movies lately? So, I thought we’d go to Red Lobster.  Red Lobster sound all right to you?
Aw man work is killing me.  Yeah, you’re like the new now aren’t you?  Yeah, oh, I was watching MTV the other day.  You gotta go for a ride in my new Saturn.  “, Ted?”  Aw man so what Bruce Willis does.  / Aw man, it was kick ass. / I didn’t like it. / I thought. / Really?  Because / I just didn’t think the plot was believable.  / Really? / I mean, there’s no way you’re telling me. / Really?  Because / I mean / Because / I mean, when they’re trying to / yeah / and, there’s no way you’re telling me that / yeah / the terrorists are going to sneak a nuke past security / and then when Bruce Willis takes the controls of the 747 jumbo jet / Really? / www.disney.com. / I had a friend at Lockheed Martin telling me there’s no way / I mean / So then what Bruce Willis does is he’s like “I want the lists of the names.”  And Monsieur Manilov is like, “those records don’t exist, Chichikov.”
	


Welcome to

THE VIETNAM WAR MEMORIAL MEMORIAL

FACTS FOR THE VISITOR

e567/56:// Welcome to the Vietnam War Memorial Memorial (originally located beside the Lincoln Memorial).  In the old days, war was thought of more in the narrow sense of “armed conflict,” rather than of market-correcting phenomena, and you will notice that the structure here preserved (originally built in 1982) differs from the other War Memorials on the Mall accordingly—most striking perhaps is its absolute lack of any data tickers or digital streaming devices/LCDs.  Originally constructed in 1982, the vexing swoop of black marble and the engraved list of fatalities apparently referred only to a specific period of the Vietnam conflict and not to the ongoing, permanent equilibria-event.  The vexing swoop of black marble and the rather unwieldy engraved list of fatalities apparently referred only to a specific period of the Vietnam conflict (most likely the original period, 1965-1973).  Astonishing as it may be to today’s visitors, the original function of this monument appears to have been nothing more than to remind people that the “conflict” had “happened.”  The data which you see chiseled out on the low monolith face, for example, is completely unautomated, and is not linked to the Stock Exchange in any way.

Chichikov regarded the names engraved in the marble slabs one last time:

[blacked out] fdgdfvg
[blacked out]fdvdfv  
[blacked ofvdf
[blacked outvfdfvdfdfb
[blacked out]     d 
[blacked out]      vc
[blacked out]  v
[blacked ou
[blacked out]    vv
[blacked out]vfddfv


It is interesting because you don’t know in the end if it is really happening or just another projection of the dementia; or whether the events of the past really happened or were just adornments superimposed by the psychosis on top of the truth, which was still too painful to face.  You are never sure whether the reality that is being presented is the reality of what actually happened, or just another projection of the dementia; and what you don’t wonder is whether the present reality is actually a manipulation of what is happening in order to reflect something else which, even though it had happened, remained unarticulated.




